
The
DEMAND,
DEPARTURE,
DANGER,
AND DECISION
OF A PRODIGAL SON
Youthful Age Is A Sensitive Stage. This Story Will Equip You With The Truth To Excel Safely


CHUKWUMA NNAMANI

 
Dedication
This work is dedicated to all the teenagers who are struggling with the seductive enticements of worldliness especially our two sons Exousia and Dominion. I pray that this work will be a divine hook that will keep you from far country and to knit you to the heavenly Father who loves you so much and is willing to give you everything even His kingdom.

Table Of Contents:
1.	Introduction
2.	Demand of the Prodigal Son
3.	Division of the Property By The Prodigal Father
4.	Departure of the Prodigal Son
5.	Deal of Distant Country
6.	Danger of Far Country
7.	Danger of Severe Famine
8.	Deployment of the Prodigal Son
9.	Dawning of Decision
10.	Decision of the Prodigal Son
11.	Darling Father

INTRODUCTION
Luke 15:1-4
Now the tax collectors and "sinners" were all gathering around to hear him. But the Pharisees and the teachers of the law muttered, "This man welcomes sinners and eats with them." Then Jesus told them this parable: NIV

As a good artist, Jesus uses parables as one of His finishing tools in His teachings to impress truths in the hearts of men. Morestill, whenever He desires to veil a truth to the crowd or nail it deeper in the hearts of His disciples, parable becomes His potent anvil.

This parable stems from the background when the Pharisees and teachers of the law began to complain that Jesus was welcoming and eating with the tax collectors and sinners who gathered around Him. In order to paint before them the kind of joy that fills the heart of the heavenly Father and the hosts of heaven when a sinner returns, He then told these three strands of stories. The first was the owner of sheep who left his 99 sheep in order to go and find one sheep that was lost in her foolishness in the field. When he found it, he was very joyful and called his friends and neighbors to rejoice with him. Jesus said there is greater joy in heaven over one sinner that repents than other 99 righteous people who don’t need to repent.

The picture of a woman who lost her silver coin in her house out of her carelessness was the second story. Realizing the value of that silver coin, she light a lamp, sweep the house and searched carefully until she found it. When she found it, she called her friends and neighbours. Jesus said, “There is rejoicing in the presence of angels of God over one soul who repents.”

The third interesting story reveals a young son who of his volition choose to leave the father in order to go and taste life in a far country. Unfortunately for him, life was not as he thought in the far country outside the father. After the beatings of life, he came to his senses and realised that he had gotten it wrong. He took a decision to go back to his father as a servant no longer as a son. At his arrival, he met a compassionate father who all the while has been expecting his return not minding his waywardness.

This true picture of a compassionate father was what Jesus has been trying to convey to the first receipients of the story and to all of us present readers. He wanted to reveal God as the “Prodigal Father” who is ready to unconditionally receive all the prodigal children who come back to Him. He is so glad and ready to receive any of his sons who was dead in sin or lost in the world with great celebration.

This last story of the prodigal son with a loving father is the focus of this study. We shall be considering extensively the demand, departure, deal, danger, deployment and discovering of the prodigal son in the distant country outside the father and also, the darling compassionate Heart of the father when his wayward son returns. Instead of condemning him, he cherished, clothed and celebrated him.

Jesus told this story with a daring objective. He wanted each man to see himself. Both the prodigal sinners and the legalistic righteous are portrayed in the story. My earnest prayer is that you will join me to see yourself in this story. The revelation of this story is not about any other person than you and me. Don’t read it thinking about one young person in a distant country 2000 years ago when Jesus preached this message. If you read it with such mind, you will hardly see nothing out of what Jesus wanted you to see. But if you read like me the first time He showed me the story, I really cried. I saw what a life could be outside our Heavenly Father. It’s a terrible life. A distance from the heavenly Father can make Me to lose everything. It made me more conscious and careful even in my daily walk with Him. I feared living outside the will of my Father in heaven, for that is a pathway to a terrible far country.

Beloved, I pray the Lord who encountered me in this story when I read it to also greatly and graciously encounter your heart as you sincerely open yourself to see what He desires you to see in this story. I trust it will leave you with a journey back home to the Father’s presence who has been longing and wanting to celebrate your return to him along with all the angels of heaven. Into His gracious hands I commit and commend you and this book praying Him to grant you rest which your soul has been longing for. Great Grace!!


CHAPTER TWO
DEMAND OF THE PRODIGAL SON.
Luke 15:12
The younger said to his father, father give me my share of the estate. So he divided his property between them.

Verse 11 introduced this story is concerned with a family life of a father and his children. The story revealed the character of each member in the family, the father and his two sons. The first person on the picture was the younger son. So, there is the older and younger son. The first and chief character in the story is the younger son. He came and made his request to his father. He was not a slave nor a servant. He came to his father because of the relationship with his father who brought him into the world. He knew all he needed in life as a son must come from his father.

The word father means source or head. The father is the source of all that the son will need to live. He is his head that thinks and takes care or watch over him in life. When needs arose, the first place the young son went to speak of his need was to his father. It was “his father”. Not another person’s father. He did not go to any other person to attend to his needs. He did not speak to his friends, uncle, brothers, government, king, rulers, etc. He spoke to his father.

As a father, no child who is not of my loin has right to come and demand an inheritance from me. The ones who have such a legal right into my bedroom to make demands of their needs are either my biological, adopted, or spiritual children. Any child I have not begotten has no right to make demands of his inheritance from me. It is also my parental responsibility to take care of the needs of my children. I know their needs even before they ask. It is my responsibility to provide for their basic needs. Their clothing, food, shelter, school fees, etc. are always in my mind to attend to. They come only to remind me their needs as a means of fellowship and communion. Their needs are one of the things that bring them into my presence. Whenever they have needs, they must come to let me know.

Our Father in heaven is not a different father from the above. He longs for the fellowship and communion of His children. Children born not of human will but the will of God. Children who received Jesus into their lives and He gave them right to be His children. Children born and regenerated by His Spirit. Children who have been translated from the kingdom of darkness to the kingdom of His dear Son in the light.

Beloved, is God your Father? When you have need, who do you speak to first? Do you speak to other men or do you speak to your Father? Who is your source in life? Do you have relationship that guarantees access to speak to Him at any time concerning your needs and inheritance?

Sonship is our boldness into His presence to demand our inheritance. If you are not born again, you have no right to enter into His presence to pray. Your prayer will be an abomination before Him. In fact, prayer will be a strange thing for you. You will be struggling to pray. You can only pray because of troubles of life. And after the trouble is over prayer ceases. But children born of heavenly Father find fellowship in the presence of God. It is the presence of their Father. If prayer is for children of God, my question now is, “Are you born of God?” If not why not respond to John 1:12-13

Yet to all who received him, to those who believed in his name, he gave the right to become children of God— children born not of natural descent, nor of human decision or a husband's will, but born of God. NIV

From the request of this young son, we are noting some things about him that made him actually young. They include;

His Demand Was To the Father
The young son maximized his relationship with his father to make his request. He did not go to any other person. It was to his father he made his demand. He knew that his father was his source for life. He knew that all that he needed in life must come through his father. He did not go to the friends, cousins, aunt, government, etc. He came and spoke to his father.

His Demand Was Selfish- problem of selfishness Give Me My-
Though they were two brothers, his demand was just for himself. He did not consider his elder brother in his request. It was all about me and my. He never considered we or us. One of the characteristics of this young son is selfishness. He was self-centered. All he asked of the father was just for himself. His interest did not include any other person. This a general characteristic of childishness. By nature, children are selfish. Once they get what they are crying for, they care not about any other person. Christian babes are in the same shoe. They come to the Father of all glory to present their needs. Their list is filled with “My this or my that.” By the content of your prayer before the Father, you shall be reckoned a young son or elder.

His Demand was on share of estate-
His object of demand was on the share of his father’s estate. He did not ask for service or share in the responsibility of the father. He did not demand for what made his father rich. He simply was interested in the inheritance of the father not in the life and labour of his father.

His Demand was sudden- problem of impatience
Some translations added “now.” He just came up with a sudden request. He was not the right person to have demanded for the share of the property hence, the first son. If there was anybody to made such request, it was supposed to be the first son. But this young son was impatience to wait for his share at the right time. Culturally, it is the father who should call his children at his old age to share his inheritance among them. Alas, this young son could not allow his father to do such.

His Demand was stupendous- problem of foolishness
His demand was a stupid request in the sense that inheritance is bequeathed only when the owner is dead. His father was still alive yet, he was making a request on his property. What then would the father live on?

In all these we see the characteristics of childishness in the request of this young son. This is still the case of an average young person both in age or faith. There major challenge is selfishness, impatience, and folly.

What is your prayer request like? Is it full of me, my, mine, I, etc. Or we, us, ours? What is the object of your request? Is it goods or God Himself? Do you come to God asking Him to give you or to make you? Reflect on all these and may the Lord give you understanding.

Lord, help me to align my requests and demand in your presence to be according to your will. Deliver me from foolish, impatience and selfish prayers.



CHAPTER TWO
DIVISION OF THE PROPERTY BY THE PRODIGAL FATHER
 	Luke 15:12
The younger one said to his father, 'Father, give me my share of the estate.' So he divided his property between them. NIV

When the young son demanded portion of his estate from his father even though selfish, sudden, and stupendous yet, the father out of his magnanimous heart gave it to him. He did not try to query why, what and how the son will manage the property. He was a loving father who is rich in mercy and of his great love is ready to give his children all that is needed for life and godliness. Let check some possible reasons why the father divided the property and gave the young son his own portion;
1. It was his nature to give
2. He knew and understood the nature of the childishness of the young son
3. He was rich that even after the young son had left with his portion there is still enough left.
4. He wanted the young son to go an experiment the life he has been longing quietly in his heart to finally take a decision whether to live with the love of the father or strangers.

All these are the things are the things possibly that make the father to give the young son his demand.














CHAPTER THREE
THE DEPARTURE OF THE PRODIGAL SON.
Luke 15:13

Not long after that, the younger son got together all he had, set off for a distant country and there squandered his wealth in wild living.

Not after long, the younger son’s request was granted by his father who divided his estate among them, the young son got together all he had, set off for a distant country. When he was making his demand, he did not give his father any reason for his request. It seemed like a legitimate request of a grown-up son who wanted to begin and become responsible in life while the father was still alive. That could be assumption. But here we, are seeing the picture motive in action. His departure let’s therefore observe

I.	His departure was not long after he received his share of inheritance.
This is to say, it was the inheritance that kept him in the house all the while and now he has gotten what he wanted, it is now time for departure. this still the case between men and God. most at times, god’s answer to our requests or provisions usually drives us away from him. when we ask him for money, he gives it to us. not too long, our hearts and minds will be lost in planning and calculation on how to use that money that is meant to bring deeper relationship with him as we ask him how to manage what he has provided. Rather, those things are now taking us out of his presence. our request brought us closer to him. there was a communication and communion between him and us. our needs bring us into his presence. These needs include; money, food, phones, admission, wisdom, intelligence, job, clothing, power, positions, possessions, healing, open doors of ministry, anointing to minister in my generation, opportunity to preach the word of God with deep convention and revival across all the different local church denomination, etc. All these needs are what kept us in His presence praying, fasting, and crying unto Him for our portion of inheritance in the land of the living as his sons. The problem is not whether God will give us all these, the problem is what happens not too long after He has granted our request

II.	His departure was well planned / deliberate
Not too long after his inheritance was given to him, the younger son got together all he had. He took time to arrange and gather them. It was not a sudden action. Actually, the journey had been in his heart quietly waiting for the day the father will answer his request. The first preparation was in his heart before the physical or outward manifestation. He got together all he had. He did not live anything behind. Possibly, he was not thinking of coming back home. His journey was deliberate. It was not an afterthought. He took time to plan it.

Now that God has not given me those wishes and requests what is the true character or exposition of my heart. Am I not made up of what to do once the requests come? Am I not already planning and preparing in my heart the kind of life and where to journey to with God’s blessing or break through and open doors when they come? How firm is my determination to live in the presence of my heavenly Father no matter what? Am I still going to spend as much time as I do today when the heavens are open to me? How faithful and discipline will I still be with my days and weeks of fasting and prayer? Will God’s blessing not cause me to depart from God’s presence?

It is not easy to receive the portion of my inheritance and still maintain communion with the father! Lord please help my heart.

Way out:
 I must not go for portion of the property rather I should go for portion of the person of the Father. If the father becomes my inheritance in the land of the living, then, it will still be with Him who manages all these for me.

I need to really understand and reflect on what the younger son received from his father. He received all he needed for life. He received all that he was meant to have in life. He received what is meant to reproduce for his future. He received what will sustain him all through life. What he demanded from his father was, “father give me my share of the estate”. He demanded for his share of his estate. It was that which pertain to him. It was all that was meant for him from his father.

Actually, the implication was that if he received this, he would no longer have need of his father any more. Because all is now at his disposal. He is now a manager of his own, distinct from his father. He is now independent of his father. He is now on his own to do as he pleased. He can now do or go anywhere he want without the father’s consent because the father has settled him for life.

Beloved, this is a dangerous state in life in our walk with God when He has given us our heart desire and allows us to do as we want! Lord please don’t me any blessing you will not be there to administer for me. It takes a disciplined heart to maintain the Father’s presence when the heavens are open for a man.

Lord, show me mercy. Please don’t give me any blessing you know that will make me to depart from your presence and sweet communion. Let it never come to me at all

III.	His departure was to a distant country.
The younger son after receiving his estate in a short while gathered all he had and set off for a distant country. A distant or far country is a country that is really far indeed. It was not a nearby country. It was a country that will take days, weeks, months, or years to reach. Such a country demands proper preparation.

Perhaps, the younger son wanted such a country very far from his father and home. A country where no one will hear anything about him. A country where he will be free to do and discharge all that has been in his heart. A country where the father will not be in a haste to locate him. This son knows the compassionate nature of his father’s heart. He knew that after a while the father’s heart will come after him. And if he was in a nearby country, the father could persuade and fetch him back to his house. So, in order to avoid such disturbance, he set off to a distant country outside the father’s reach.

It was a far country because it is beyond the reach of the father. It was a far country because it was such a place where everything about him was not known by the members of the family. A far country is a place of no contact, communication, or communion with the father. It is a place of absolute lost in relationship with home. It is a place distance and far in communication and communion with the father. It is a place where the father’s presence, word and warmth can no longer be felt. It is a place where the father’s wishes and words are not obeyed. A distance place is distance because it is a distance from the father.

For me, a distant country is not that of place but presence. I am in a distance country once I am no longer in touch or deep communication with my heavenly Father. I am in a far country when my heart is no longer in communion with my Lord.  My far country is the disposition of my heart with my Father. A journey to far country is whenever I am outside the will, wishes or word of God. Actually, I am in distant country when I am touching or living in any sort of sin. Sin separates us from God. Isaiah 59:1-2 puts it thus;

Surely the arm is not short to save, nor his ear too dull to hear. But your iniquities have separated you from your God; your sins have hidden his face from you, so that he will not hear.”

A far country is a place of sin. Once in sin, I am in far country separated from the heavenly Father. It is a point of separation from the Father. I can be in the church, yet I am in far country. I can even be in prayer meetings, yet, I am in far country. I can even be lost in activities yet, in far country. A far country is any point I am lost in an intimate, deep and tangible communion with God because of sin. It is the point when sin has separated me from hearing the Father’s voice. It is the point where I choose to follow my will and wishes outside that of the father.

Beloved, where are you? Are you in the presence of your Father or far country? How clear is his voice to your soul? Do you still hear His tender voice as a father speaks to his child? How deep is your communion with Him? Do you know and do His will, wishes, and words? What you are doing presently, is it His will? Is there any sin that have separated you from him? Now is a time to bow your heart to return to Him in prayers.

CHAPTER FOUR
THE DEAL OF DISTANT COUNTRY
Luke 15:13

Not long after that, younger son got together all he had, set out for a distant country there squandered his wealth in wild living.

As this young son did set off for his journey, his destination was for a distant country. It will be good and wise for us to carefully consider some things about this distant country.

It is a place of wasteful living, squandering, and spending
To squander means to spend something carelessly and recklessly. It is to mismanage resources. It is to use valuable things on irrelevant things. It is to give out money or valuable things without expecting valuable returns.

There at the distance country, this younger son squandered his wealth. A Distant country is a place that its primary characteristics is spending. It is not a place of investments as to receive returns. Such does not exist there. Anyone coming there is not coming to invest or receive anything but to spend the ones he came with. There is no place for investment. It’s all about giving out, spending and squandering. If you come with valuable things, be sure you will spend it carelessly there.

A distance country is a place of careless spending. There, all things are glittering but they are not gold. It is a place you spend your valuable things thoughtlessly, recklessly and carelessly. There you spend your time carelessly. Let’s now consider some of the things this young man squandered in a far country.

He squandered his time.
Time is one of the most precious valuables of life. Time well spent is life well lived. In fact, time is life. As a song says, “Time is money” I still say that time is bigger than money. You become whatever you give your time. If you give your time in learning tailoring, you will inevitably become a tailor. If you spend your time learning information technology, you will become computer experts. If you spend time drinking, you will definitely become a drunkard. If you spend your time going after women/men you will surely become a womanizer/manizer. You become what you give your time to. If you give your time to learning the Bible, you will become a Bible student/teacher.

Men who were great achieved that because they used and maximise their time well. They spent most of their time in what they finally became experts in. They thoughtfully and carefully used their time well. They ensured that every minute of their time counted. As they discovered their purpose of existence, they gave time to developing themselves towards achieving it.

The young son wasted his time. He did not use it well. He used this precious gift carelessly. He used it for things that do not matter. He did not invest his time in things that matter. He did not use it for things that will enhance his productivity in life. Possibly, he used it for games, pornography, movies, chatting, dating, immoral relationship, cultism, jokes, betting, drinking et cetera. All these do not add to what will help him become meaningful in life.

As a young man or girl, what are you doing with your time? How much of your time is spent with the word of God? Off your 24 hours, how much takes prayer each day? What will make you effective as a student is ardent commitment of your time to your studies. As a minister, devotion to the word of God and prayer are inevitable. If I do not spend more of my time in prayer and word of God, then I should never expect to come out an effective minister in the hands of God in my generation. Rather, I will become whatever takes my time. As good as games are, if it takes much of my time, then all I will definitely become is a good and effective game player. But not a correct student or child of God. As a father, if I give my time to family then I will reap good family relation. What you sow with your time, you will reap. The worst of all is wasting time. You must not waste time.  Wasting time is not using time for what it is meant for. Ecclesiastes . 3 :1  says
“There is a time for everything and a season for every activity under heaven.”

This reveals that at every point in time there is time that is allocated to every activity in life. I must ensure that each activity is attended to at its own time. Time for sleeping must not be used for watching film. The time of studying Bible or praying must not be used for chatting. Time wasted is irrecoverable. Anything you did not do at its time is either foregone or will spill into another time schedule for another activity and thereby bringing confusion.

One of the pieces of evidence that I am in a far country is that I will be mismanaging my precious time. I will hardly use my time for anything meaningful because I am far from the father who would have been Checkmating and helping me to do the right thing at the right time.

He squandered his talent.
Every gift is meant to help and edify fellow men. It is meant to solve a problem. A Carpenter is to use his gift in manufacturing and repairing wood problem. Is Singer is to use his voice to educate, encourage or cheer the Wearing heart.

A gift is wasted when it is not put into use at all. It is a waste when it is not being used for the purpose for which it was given. When a good tailor instead of Sewing Clothes is rather busy With Watching football. He is wasting that gift. By not using that gift, he brings scarcity in the society.

Again, to squander a gift is to use it wrongly. Using gifts for selfish gain and pride is a serious abuse. Someone can equally squander a talent by using the gift that was supposed to help man to destroy. The man. As a singer can use his songs to lead men into idolatry and immorality like Actors and actresses. Doctors who use their talents in abortion are equally squandering their gift. A preacher who supposed to be preaching and presenting Christ and him crucified as the only way of salvation, rather is making merchandise and extortion of men is squandering such gift.

Far country is a place of squandering talent. How far with my own gift? I maximizing in helping men or am I hiding it or using it for selfish gain? I should always remember that far country is a place I waste my talent. Because I am no longer under the watchful care of the Father, I can easily afford to do and undo with his gift to me.

He squandered his treasures.
Treasures are valuable things of life. They are things that can easily be converted To still get another treasure. They are things a man will lose and he will seriously regret it. The followings are possible treasures which the young son squandered in a far country and which any man there can as well prone to squander.
i.	The treasure Of money.
Money is a great treasure that once you have it, any other material treasure will be at your disposal. According to proverbs, money answers all things. Money will bring any material thing to you. That is why it is a treasure. With it you can have good house, wine, food, certificates, jewelries, etc. Everybody wants to have money because it is a great treasure. Unfortunately, in far country, men spend carelessl This great treasure. They use it for things that do not matter. They spend it on things that would not help them Nor help others.

ii.	Treasures of material possession.
A man may not have physical money. But he may have other valuable possessions. They include land, buildings, gold, diamond, jewelries, car, clothes, business, etc. All these are treasures because they can be exchanged for money or other valuable. They have the capacity to generate returns if invested and it will sustain a man.
I think these were the things the young son gathered to set out for the far country. So there is no room for investing them, therefore they were all squandered. He exchanged them for things that do not have value. Can you imagine jus to have a sex of 10 minutes at most with a prostitute or any adulterous girl, He will give her his costly gold. What a waste.
How do I spend my costly materials? When I sell any of my valuable items what do. I do with the money? Do I consume it in lustful pleasure of partying, or food? Do I give out my valuables carelessly to men/women in a bid to satisfy my lustful pleasure? Where do I spend my valuable possession?
Judah in Gen. 38:13-23 lost his seal its cord and his staff in his quest to sleep with a seeming prostitute. He came to that place, but uncontrolled craving for sex made him to lose all of them. This is the experience of far country. Once you leave the presence of the father, you can do and undo. Who knew that Judah could commit such a thing? If it was in his house with his brother, he would not have tried such. Because he was far from his house, he saw opportunity to explore evil and thereby lost his valuable possession.
The seal, its cord and staff symbol or sign of his manhood strength and authority. It is what bring respects to him as a Prince in his house. It is what shows his origin. They are what show, who and where he is from. They are his strength. Just as a stroll of far country, he lost all with a prostitute. Not even on any meaningful thing, but on a prostitute.
What are my material possessions I have or is losing because of my carelessness? How do I spend my Data on the Interne? Do I use it for immoral things? Do I lose my data on pornography or useless entertainment movies? The songs on my phones are there holy or far country music? songs that my father will be displeased if he hears. I cannot escape waste of material possession once I am in a far country.
iii.	The Treasure of the body
Our body is a great gift. God has given to every one of us to execute his purpose on Earth. With it we can get every other treasure. Every other thing. Paralyses once the body is not sound. A man without a sound body cannot do anything with time or talent, for he will only be on the bed waiting for God to heal him or her. But unfortunately, this group gives has been greatly abused by men, especially in far country. As far country men use their bodies wrongly. They squander this precious Gift of God there.
The body is meant for accommodation to serve God on Earth. But once outside the presence of God, men turn it to lascivious slavery.
Sex is only approved in the context and confines of legal marriage. But at far country, men chose to engage in sex anyhow. Unmarried young people enter it and abuse it. There, men instead of staying with women, prefer to lust with fellow men. This is the sin of homosexual. While women practice lesbian i.e. Sleeping and making love with their fellow women. What’s an abuse of the body in far country? This cannot be done in the presence of the father. It is only obtainable as far country where the fathers watch is far.
Others use the body for drunkenness., smoking, tattoos, paintings, gluttons, etc. Fighting, quarrelling, violence, robbery etc. The body is squandered in allsorts of immorality and wickedness. But look at the instruction of the father in 1 Cor. 6:19:
Do you not know that your body is a temple of the Holy Spirit who is in you? Whom you have received from God. You are not your own.
People do run away from the father to the far country, to defile and squander the body given to them as accommodation for God. Even when they know what God made the body for, they will willfully would not want  to obey it. That is why they travel all the way to far country to do what they want and not to please the father.
Dinah Daughter of Jacob left the father’s presence to go and know what is happening in the far country of Shechemite Even though sincerely, she went out to visit the women of the land.  Both she did not know that there was a place of squander. Immediately Shechem, saw her, He took her and violated her. All in a day. That was how Dinah lost her precious virginity just at a stroll to a far country. Men of far country know nothing but squandering. Their eyes cannot with stand a virgin. In fact, it is a taboo to be a virgin in a far country. Where everything is meant to be squandered. They can do everything possible to violate any virgin that come around them.  They can go to the extent of rape.
Amnon son of David *** in the house of his father yet, His heart was in a far country. He engaged the principle of the far country to defile his own blood sister. Once a month heart is in the far country, even if he is in the church, he will still practice their law-squander all. Amnon squandered the body-virginity of his own blood sister in his house.
What is my own position with my body? Is it still being kept holy as the temple of the Lord, or have I taken it to the far country to defile it? Are strange hands touching this temple of God? Or am I the one touching and using it to defile others through fornication, masturbation, homosexual, lesbian, etc. Or have I given this body to drunkenness, wild partying, and glutton? Outside the presence of the father, this precious body will be defiled and violated.
The worst is not just that I am squandering the body. Strange disease come into finally help in squandering the body. It is not far country that people contact HIV, syphilis, gonorrhea, etc. Because they have abused the body, the body will as well begin to abuse them.
 How long will I tarry in this far country? Will I be there until all is squandered and I have nothing but death left for me? Will I not lift my voice to my heavenly Father for mercy and deliverance from this mess, while there is still Breath of life before it is too late.
It is a place of wild living.
Luke 15:13……….And there squandered his wealth in wild living.
 Let’s start first by looking at wild animals. A wild animal is animal that is untamed, Uncontrolled and Uncultured..  It is not friendly with human. They lack the care and provision of humans. The hunt food for themselves.  They do a home which human provides. They do as they like. They lack control. They live in the Bush rather than in the home.

Having seen the picture of a wild animal, so we can now say that a wild living is a living void of home. It is to live a life without human control. It is an untamed, uncultured and Uncontrolled living.. A life that break laws and boundaries. A life without plan and purpose. It is only interested in what will please himself. It is a life that has no home. It sleeps anywhere darkness dawn on him. Its habitation is in the club, hotel, caves, banks, Cricks, Mami, etc. It lives in an ungodly environment.

A wild living is friendship and companion with the wicked. Such life hardly has good friend. He goes. After people of same kind. Drunkards, prostitutes, robbers, assassins, cultists, gamblers etc. They all have one thing in common- rebellion and lawlessness. A wild living is living against or contrary to the law of nature, state and heaven. They neither obey man or God. They are giving over to lasciviousness and all manner of immorality. How is my life? Who are my friends? What is my disposition with rules and regulations in the family, schools, church, or nation? Where is my home? Do I prefer staying in the Bar parlour, Hotel club or any place outside my home?

Far country is a place of wild living. Men there live contrary to the rules and regulations, they prefer living outside the home. There derive joy in partnering and company with bad people. They avoid relationship and friendship with good people who will give them godly counsel on how to live correct life.

Wild living is a nature and life of a man in the far country. It is a life contrary to the will and word of God. It is a life that refuses to submit to both human and divine authority. How do I take instruction from authorities, parents, teachers, elders, boss ministers etc.? Do I resist their instruction? Do I flare up and walk out on them? Then I should watch. I could be citizen or far country beware!

Chapter 5.
THE DANGER OF FAR COUNTRY.
After he had spent everything, there was a severe famine in that whole country and he began to be in need. VS16

While this young son was with the father, he thought that far country was the best place for him. So he demanded that the father should give him his own portion of the estate, which he did. And not too long, he gathered all he had and set out for the far country. And we have seen the deals in far country. That far country is a place of spending, waste and squandering of resources such as time, talents and treasures without hope of returns. Again, it is a place of wild living. There, man live like animal. No home, no law!
Here in this first we are now seeing what began to be for this younger son and all who are in that country. The fate of far country is not just for the younger son the experience is for every citizen of the far country. Let’s now take time to look at those dangers men suffer in far country.
•	Danger of spending everything.
•	Danger of severe famine.
•	Danger of scarcity
Danger Of Spending Everything. VS16- After he had spent everything,
The first shock the young son must have had was to discover that everything has finished. He came to the far country with all the wealth he received from his father. He came as a rich man. He had with him many precious valuable things like money, gold, silver, diamonds, clothing’s, jewelries, Flock and herds. Etc. But as he arrived, he registered as a full citizen of that country and began to live by the principles of that country. And the first law was “squander all in wild living.” He saw the seeming life there and began to live it. He started spending. Possibly he started with money. He used his money to buy apartment on where to live? If he wants to eat or drink, he will buy it with money. When money finished. He started exchanging his gold, silver, Jewelries, and diamonds. And before you know it all finished. He then sold his animals. When the animals finished, he pounced on some of home furniture and utilities he bought when he had money. He started selling them and spend the money on while living.
Remember that the spending is on wild living. He was using it to drink, smoke, gamble, jackpot, bet, sleep with girls, buy gifts for them, Host party in his house buy costly clothes modern gadgets, etc. His time was always on either of these wildlife. He never had time to develop himself. He never had time to read good books. He never had time to research on how best to invest his wealth so that he would be much wealthier. All his time was spent on wild living.  Though he possibly had talents he learned when he was with his father, yet he did not practice it for long time. When everything finished, he wanted to start using his talent. It happened that he had forgotten some of the practices and there was no longer money to improve himself.
Again, perhaps because of too much drink and sexual transmitted disease, he might contracted, some of his money will be spent on hospital and drugs. Be sure that wild living are always friends of police. He cannot be living Wild and escape the confines of prison yards.
In far country there are so much avenue open for spending. No man there will escape spending. Harlots, bars, musicians, courts, parties, pornography, cinema, casino, etc. are all thriving industry designed to catch the attention and exploit every new citizen in town with wealth. They are so attractive that you cannot resist their charms. Actually, they are the central attraction events that lure men to this far country. These are the so called life that draw men from all part of the world to come and spend their resources.
One of the things that drained this young man is the daughters of far country. The girls were very pretty, beautiful, seductive and irresistible. Their erotic and sexy dressing is designed to charm and defeat the eyes of everyman that come in contact with them. Their clothes are well designed to revealed ‘hot” parts of their body. You can’t see their “hot” legs, nose, eyes and shape without a second gaze at them and seek for their friendship.
Everything about them is seductive. Their painting, hairstyle, lipstick, cat walking, eyes contact, bomb shots, ass level etc. all these are targeted at sticking lustful thoughts in the heart of any man that come in contact with them. And once their arrows strike the mind, the man begins to burn with unquenchable lustful desire, which enslaves his whole emotions. He can never rest again until he goes to satisfy that uncontrollable passion. And to do that, you must spend money to attract the particular girl that charmed your heart. Even though what you want is sex and she also knows that you like what you saw and have become her slave. That is when she will now begin to dribble you like a fool. She starts her demands of jewelries, clothing, phones, cosmetics, money, etc.
One of the ways to identify daughters of far country is their stupendous demands. They will demand and demand until they see that you have spent all. They already know you are their captive. Knowing that what you saw has caused a wildfire in your soul, they can’t stop but suck you until all is gone. Some who could not afford their demands, go home to become slave of masturbation or join gay club.
Have you wondered why an average young man is enslaved with masturbation? They are burning because of the fiery darts of the daughters of far country, either the one that they come in contact with physically or movies or pornography. It is their seductive nature that make many young boys to burn their data on pornography. Oh, daughters of the far country have drained many. I suppose one of the things that consumed the wealth of this young man was his bid to catch the daughters of far country.
JEZEBEL THEIR MOTHER
 Taking a brief glance of Jezebel will reveal clearly the nature of these Daughters of far country. Look at 2 kings 9:30
Then Jehu went to Jezreel. When Jezebel heard about it, she painted her eyes, arranged her hair and looked out of a window
I want you to quickly note her armory. Immediately she heard that a vibrant young man entered the city she prepared for battle. Her battle was not of the sword and javelin. It was seduction.


She painted her eyes.
The first question we must ask is why? How could she heard that Jehu came into the city and the first thing she did was to paint her eyes. There must be something in her eyes. Her eyes must have been a strong weapon in seducing men. She prepared her eyes for war. She decorated it with seductive colours and mixtures. She painted it in such a way to attract the attention of men. It was not just ordinary painting. It was a special painting targeted for Jehu who came into the town.

Jezebel knew that Jehu came to kill her. But her own weapon was not in physical muscle or weapon, but her body. Who knows how many men she had exploited and destroyed with this her painted eyes? Such well painted eyes are irresistible to young men. It was a painting with force and full backing of hell. It’s a painting inspired by demons. It was such a painting that only a man by the help of the spirit of God, can resist.

 She arranged her hair.
Another thing Jezebel prepared as her arsenal was her hair. I am seriously asking why the hair? What is in the hair that can attract a man? I might not know, but Jezebel knew. For Jezebel, she knew that her hair was a serious and strong weapon to attract the attention of any strongman. Jezebel knew that her glory is in her hair.

Does not the very nature of things teach you?... That if a woman has long hair, it is her glory. For long hair is given her as a covering. 1 Cor. 11:14-15

Long before Paul wrote, Jezebel already knew that there is glory in her hair to charm men, not just the nature, would have taught demons would have inspired her.

So an average daughter of far country like their mother spends time. Energy, money and strength arranging and decorating her, knowing it’s her weapon. They can spend 24 hours Plaiting, weaving or arranging their hair Just to catch the attention of careless young man. Even when their natural hair is not start much attractive, they can spend heavy money to buy attractive wigs or weaving. Once there is a man to catch, then the hair Must be prepared and arranged. As a weapon of seduction. Beware! Oh young men.

And looks out of a window.
Having fully prepared, she now release her arrow by looking out of a window. For Jehu to see her. She cannot be indoor. Once prepared, she goes out for the targeted audience. As she looked out, she did not see two people, she saw Jehu. And she never looked out of a window until “as Jehu entered the gate”. She did not want another man to be caught by her shot. It was specifically meant for Jehu. She targeted the right time when he will enter and she will look out of a window. With the window he might not see other parts of the body, but must see the eyes painted and hair arranged for him.

This Jezebel has killed many prophets of God. She even challenged Elijah, the man of God. But thank God for Jehu who resisted his arsenal of seduction and killed her. He was able to do this because he had the anointing of God upon him. The only man that can resist the fiery darts of Jezebel and her daughters in any nation and generation are men under the influence and control of the spirits of the heavenly father. But once you are in far country, woe is you, you can’t resist them. Instead, you will succumb to prison of Masturbation where those already wounded by their arrows are caged.

Oh young man. Has the fairy darts of daughters of far country hooked your soul? Are You spending your money on them? Fortunately again, this daughters of our country may not want you to spend your money on them. They may want you to spend your manhood. They want to drain your first strength of your manhood. You imagine that your first strength of semen, which was supposed to be bring your first child, was wasted. Squandered. And spilled upon a strange woman.  What a waste! They are out to drain. Don’t conclude “after all, I am not spending my money.” Yes, when they are not after your money, then they are after the most precious valuable of your manhood – your seed. They can’t even go to the extent of giving you money so long as you are wasting your sperm on them.  They know as long as you are spending it, you are spending both your life and all your generation in your loin. What a waste!




A Youth Who Lacked Judgment
Proverbs 7:7-16
I saw among the simple, I noticed among the young men, a youth who lacked judgment. He was going down the street near her corner, walking along in the direction of her house at twilight, as the day was fading, as the dark of night set in. Then out came a woman to meet him, dressed like a prostitute and with crafty intent. (She is loud and defiant, her feet never stay at home; now in the street, now in the squares, at every corner she lurks.) She took hold of him and kissed him and with a brazen face she said: "I have fellowship offerings at home; today I fulfilled my vows. So I came out to meet you; I looked for you and have found you! I have covered my bed with colored linens from Egypt. I have perfumed my bed with myrrh, aloes and cinnamon. Come, let's drink deep of love till morning; let's enjoy ourselves with love! My husband is not at home; he has gone on a long journey. He took his purse filled with money and will not be home till full moon." With persuasive words she led him astray; she seduced him with her smooth talk. All at once he followed her like an ox going to the slaughter, like a deer stepping into a noose till an arrow pierces his liver, like a bird darting into a snare, little knowing it will cost him his life. NIV

The first target of these daughters are young men. They want to suck out life in them and leave them empty. These daughters of far country do not only go for money or other valuables. Their aim also is to all at once slaughter a young man trapped by their seduction like an ox. Here is word of God for you in Proverbs 7:24-27

Now then, my sons, listen to me; pay attention to what I say. Do not let your heart turn to her ways or stray into her paths. Many are the victims she has brought down; her slain are a mighty throng. Her house is a highway to the grave, leading down to the chambers of death. NIV

The greatest danger is not spending your time, treasure or talent, but the worst is that the highway of every soul in that country is leading to grave, leading down to everlasting chambers of hell.

Beloved, what is the disposition of your heart now? The mercy of God has come to reveal to you what you are already spending, or will spend in a far country. If you do not change your mind, surely the pathway is to the grave and chambers of death. For you to be reading this now shows that your Heavenly Father does not want you to spend everything in far country. He wants you back. Why not close your eyes now to plead with him to show you mercy?







CHAPTER SIX
THE DANGER OF SEVERE FAMINE.
….there was a severe famine in that whole country

Another danger that struck the far country is famine. Not just famine, but severe famine. Let equally note

The famine was specific – “There”
Observe the word “there.” It means it was particular at the far country. Other surrounding countries may not be experiencing such famine. It was only peculiar to those living in far country. People in other countries are hard working, wise and thoughtful in investing their wealth to yield more wealth for them. But the citizens of far country are only good in spending, wasting and squandering their wealth. It’s like they survive by the entrance of people that came in newly into the country. They will petch on him or her to suck and drain until he or she spend all.

Once a person comes in, all the people in their various outfits and preoccupation will come with their enticement to collect their share.  Bet, musicians, eateries, gamblers, boutique, cultists, gangster, cinema, Daughters of Far Country will all come to display their fantasies in order to collect their share of new arrival wealth. Mostly this country is usually visited by younger people who are tired of dos and don’ts of their parents.
It’s like when they finished sucking this young son and he spends everything then  severe famine came.

The famine was severe – a severe famine
Easier means more than serious. Famine means that a country is suffering from drought and thereby no food and diseases killing both man and animals. Famine means That’s an average person finds it difficult to eat a meal a day. It is even difficult to see food. And when you see food, it will be very costly. Food which is among the basic necessities of life, can only now be afforded only by the very few rich persons. Famine Does not just affect just the food and water. People die of Both hunger and thirst.
There at the far country was a severe famine. If famine means scarcity of food and water when it is now “severe” then, it means that it is no longer scarce, but there is no more food at all.
The famine was sundry - in that whole country
The famine cuts across every city, street and family of the far country. Everybody in far country experiences severe famine of the basic necessities of life. Wants normally comes upon them like a bandit. The cause is not Farfetch. They are lazy! Citizens of far country Only good in spending and living a wildlife. Once every man has finished what he had, there is no means of getting back anything. Then famine will visit. severe famine is normal in far country. Every of her citizens tastes it.
Scarcity is one resources cut short. When there is no re-source. When the channel or supply is stopped or finished. As long as there is supply, there will be no scarcity. But once supply ceases, scarcity and want will come as a bandit. All the citizens of far country were people who broke Their relationship with their father in order to go and gratify their selfish indulgences and cravings. They never know that their father is the source of their All in all. They collected little from their father, not knowing that That little will soon finish. Because of their young nature, they have not learnt how to make Investment of little they have so that it will yield more increase for them. Instead of first asking their father to teach them how to catch fish, the first  Askee asked their father to give them fish. They thought that life is all about spending. They never cared to know how their father became what he became, and got what he gave them. Because as they were with the father, all they needed was easily supplied. They thought that life Outside the father will be the same.
Quite unfortunately, they are discovering that experience is a teacher, but a worst teacher. By hunger, thirst and disease, they are learning that outside the father is severe famine. This is the lesson Everybody in far country quickly learns. Once the little they ran away with finish, experience of hunger and scarcity begins to teach them.
Severe famine and scarcity is an experience anybody in far country normally come in contact with there. It is inevitable. When you break relationship with the father, things might be seemingly going well, but give it time  when the one you left that is, when it will done on you that you are now in far country outside the father. Automatically, hardship, wants And hunger begin to inflict your life.  You will go back to square 0. Those things you had before when you were with the father will all be gone. Good food, drinks, house, clothings, job will be nowhere for you to enjoy.
beloved, do you know that 'sin closes heaven against somebody? Disobedience to our Heavenly Father brings about severe famine in life. Once a man is out of relationship, give it time, hardship and famine will come. It’s called be severe. Freeman of admission, Job opportunity, spiritual manifestation, miministry opportunity, accommodation, promotion, love in marriage, intelligence, prosperity, Such achievement etc. Some of us are experiencing one or other severe famine in life because we are out of relationship with our Heavenly Father. Life outside the father is a mess. Just be sure that, as long as you are in far country of  sin outside the father, severe famine must come in one way or the other. It is a normal experience of every citizen in far country.
The danger of scarcity.
… And he began to be in need.
 Another great danger of far country is That’ apart from national scarcity, It is personal. There was a time this younger son began his spending. Now he began to be in need. To be in need means that though they are now a serious necessity in his life. He now discovers that they are of great use for him. Severe famine had struck, and he now sees the need of those things he had wasted and squandered. It is only severe famine that can reveal to us of the real need. A man will not know his true need until he gets into severe famine. Suddenly he discovered what actually are his need in life.
 He began spending his wealth and life in useless and needless things. He was buying things that were not necessary for him. He was just spending because they was available supply. He never knew what his needs were. He had nobody to guide him because he was outside the home for a wild living. He became in need of time, but unfortunately, he had wasted his time in useless life. Time he would have used to learn and develop himself is lost. He now wished that those years he wasted will be rewind but to no avail. He now knew the true value of his time and what he should be doing with his time. A man will never realise the true value of time in life until when he enters hardship and scarcity. That is when he will discover that he has waste his time.
He possibly began to be in need of good health. Sexually transmitted diseases might have weakened his system. To the daughters of Far Country, some may now be in need of a womb or fallopian tube because abortion have damaged their uterus. Some could began to be in need of education. They left school to travel to a far country. Now that severe famine had struck, they are now regretting why did not complete their education. Education is now a serious need. He also became in need of talent, but suddenly discovered that he does not have a good skill he can now use to make money when he had opportunity to learn skill, he was not serious because of the divided heart to travel to far country. He was playing train with his learning. And finally, did not completed his learning. Even though he assumed he knew, when attempted to practice, he spoiled people’s work and no one dares bring work to him. He tried learning so many things but was good in none. Tailoring, computer, graphics, haircut, printing, cooking, salon, building, farming etc. were the things he ventured learning when he was with his father. Actually, because the father insisted that he must be skilled in life was among the reasons that fuelled his move to far country to go and live a life free of control. But now the same skill / talent is a date need for him because of the famine that have struck.
Beloved, what is your own personal need? Yes, the nation is in her famine, where is pinching you? What are you realizing now that you needed most in your life? Which you have already missed or about to miss? Have you discovered what is your greatest need in life? it was famine that revealed to the youngest son that what he needed most in life was food, drink and shelter and every other thing is secondary. He left the father in pursuit of those other things. But thank God for the severe famine that now once again came to reveal what his true need was.
Dear youth, what are you beginning to be in need of? Do you think it is relationship, admission, career, money, fame, beauty, fashion, etc. and these are the things that are making you to be distant and distracted from your heavenly father. I pray that it will not be too late when severe famine remind will struck before you will really discover that your greatest need is none of these at all. May the Lord give you understanding and open the eyes of your understanding to know what you really need now as a youth.


CHAPTER SEVEN
The Deployment Of The Prodigal Son. Luke 15:15
So he went and hired himself out to a citizen of that country who sent him to his fields to feed pigs. He longed to feel his stomach with the pods that the pigs were eating but no one gave him anything.
Right there in far country the prodigal son wasted all his resources and began to be in want. Bit of hunger taught him to look for any available job to sustain himself. Gues where he got job. In a pig farm. There he deployed himself into service. Let’s observe the implications of this deployment;

The deployment was by hiring himself out
He went and hired himself out.
Having that he had need and he cannot meet them by himself for he had spent all and there was severe famine in the whole country. Nobody can help another by himself he took the initiative of leaving his house to go and hire himself out.
The critical word I would want us to consider is hired Grk... It is to give out something in order to receive a pay after usage. This means that he donated himself to service on which no man employed him. Possibly, because of the severe famine, no one is ready to hire or employ anybody anymore. He will rather do it with his household. So at a point there was no job opportunity. Rather, companies are retrenching their staff greatly. Mass retrenchment is usually a sign of severe famine. To get job was now very difficult. Even those who have talent find it difficult let alone those who do not have.
So the only thing in the advantage of this young son is if he will survive the severe famine and not die was that he “went and hired himself out”. Note it was “himself” he hired out. Nobody employed him. He employed himself. It was automatic self-employment. It was an employment that has no terms of agreement.
Actually, in the best literal terms, to hire himself means to become a bondslave for someone. He donated himself as a tool that a man can use to do anything that pleases him. As a bondslave, he is not expecting any payment or reward. It is even a privilege to be accepted to serve. When he does a job, he will thank his master for such an opportunity. Because in a Jewish or Roman law, a slave is not regarded as a human. He is a tool who does not have any right in the law. His master can afford to maltreat and kill him;  and nobody will query him.
That is the state to which this young son degraded himself to. He who had all his wealth is now a bond slave because he is in a far country. A son is now a slave. He who supposed to be a master is now being mastered. Just because he is not where he ought to be.
Note again what he hired out “himself”. Remember he had squandered everything in a wild living. Things had finished. He had finished hiring things. The only thing remain for him now is “himself” all the while, it was this “himself” that he had been trying to please, pamper, protect, preserve, pleasure, etc. It was in order to please and pleasure himself that he left the father for far country.
Unfortunately, at the point of severe famine, he is discovering that He cannot help “himself” but to hire it out. The only thing left for him in life was “himself”, yet no food, clothing, shelter, water, hope, future for himself. The self he had always wanted to put first before any other thing is now a hired bond slave.
Look at what Jesus said about this self in Matthew 16 : 25
“for whosoever wants to save himself will lose it…”
All the while he wanted to save himself and that was why he travelled to far country. But he is now discovering the truthfulness of the word of God, that whoever wants to save himself will lose it
He knew that he was about losing himself. So, he hired it out
Beloved, are you seeing with me that in the far distance country, a man does not just hire things out. He also hired himself out when severe famine and pressure of needs came upon them after spending and wasting everything, they will have no other option than to hire themselves out. I hope I have not come to that point in my journey of life.
The deployment was to a citizen of that country.
…Hired himself out to a citizen of that country.
In order to solve the problem of severe famine, scourging, everyman this young son thought it wise to finally hire himself out. To him the best person to hire “himself” was a citizen of that country. Which country? Far country. He thought that a citizen of that country can help himself. Remember, that why he is doing all these is that he began to be in need. It is the need of how to deal with “himself”.
The greatest need of a man is not “things” but “self” the youngest son thought that his greatest need were things and that was why when he got to his father he requested for estates - things. But at this point when things finished, he is gradually realizing that it is not things that was his need but how to deal with “himself.” Which his first option was to hire it out to a citizen of that country.
Beloved, have you realized that your greatest need is not “things” but “self”? As long as yourself is not dealt with, when severe famine comes, you will spend all that God gave to you serving this self. self is a terrible tyranny. He is a king that wants everyman to serve him. He is a personality that want his inordinate cravings to be gratified. Self is that fallen nature that man inherited when Adam and Eve ate the forbidden fruit. It is a nature of disobedience. It is in enmity with our father, and cannot please him. See what happened in the Garden of Eden when this strange TT entered man. Genesis 3 : 8- 10.
And they heard the voice of the LORD God walking in the garden in the cool of the day: and Adam and his wife hid themselves from the presence of the LORD God amongst the trees of the garden. And the LORD God called unto Adam, and said unto him, Where art thou? And he said, I heard thy voice in the garden, and I was afraid, because I was naked; and I hid myself.
Do you not know that once these self began to control man, the first thing that he did to man was to hid from the Lord God among the trees of the garden. He does not like the presence of God. Wherever self is reigning, He will drag that man out from the presence of God. Man who was made in the image of girls to enjoy God and all his creation is now hiding from the Lord God among the trees.
I want you to know that the greatest problem and need of man in every nation and generation is “self” see Gal. 5:19-21 to discover the works and activities of this sinful self wherever it is ruling and reigning.
Now the works of the flesh are manifest, which are these; Adultery, fornication, uncleanness, lasciviousness, Idolatry, witchcraft, hatred, variance, emulations, wrath, strife, seditions, heresies, envying, murders, drunkenness, revellings, and such like: of the which I tell you before, as I have also told you in time past, that they which do such things shall not inherit the kingdom of God.

Self is that nature that produce all sorts is sins. You can only be free from living in sin, free to serve God and free to live the abundant life God created you to live when this sinful self is dealt with.
This was the discovery of this younger son in far country. When he discovered that his greatest need is ”himself”, he chose to hire it out. He chose to deal with it. He decided to hand it over to somebody to help him, but unfortunately, it was to the wrong person - a citizen of that country? How can a blind man help the blind?
No man living in sin can help another. Is it possible for a man in a ditch to bring another who is in a ditch with him? Two of them are trapped in the same pit. No man in far country can help you. The best he can do is to send you to pigs as we shall see later. Even if that citizen of that country is the President, Governor, King, director, richest man etc. if you hire yourself to him, he can never help. Rather, he will make you his slave the more.
Some of us A writing applications and contracting men to hire ourselves to them. However, the highest they can do is to give us things they cannot deal with ourselves, which is our greatest need? These cells that make us to smoke drink funny case. Watch pornography, practice, homosexuality or Lesbian go to party, join Cultism, masturbate, commit exam malpractice, or adultery and all sorts of evil and immorality. How can a citizen of the far country help us to deal with this self?
Beloved, I want you to know that no man in the far country can help you to deal with yourself, even if he is a big citizen of that country. Please do not hire out yourself to them. Don’t hire out yourself to cultism, they can never solve your problem. Don’t hire out yourself to homosexuality/lesbian they will increase your dilemma. Don’t think of hiring yourself to sugar daddies or mummies they are in their own trouble, seeking for who to destroy. Even the so called boy or Girl who claims to love and have fallen in love with you. If you hire yourself to him or her, unfailingly, he or she will damage it the more. No citizen of the far country can help “yourself” if you hire it to them. Don’t think don’t make the mistake of this young man. Be wise.
The Deployment was to feed pigs.
…who sent him to his fields to feed pigs?
When this young man hired himself to the citizen of this country, the best this man can do for him was to send him to “his fields to feed pigs”. This immediately tells us the kind of in lucrative business in the far country. The best is seeming good to do citizen in the far country can do is own a piggery industry.

The young man had a need, and it was because of that new that he hired himself to this citizen of the country instead of helping him and meet his need, he sent him to his fields. Note it is not just one field but fields. He has many fields where pigs are reared for him. He now turned the young man too pig servant not even a house servant. He didn’t allow this young man to stay in the house. Rather he sent him to his fields.

Do you notice that this young man’s problem is gradually increasing? He thought that this citizen of the country would have helped him if he hired himself to him, but instead the man sent him to his field to feed the pigs. He distanced him from man and made him a company of pigs. It is no longer that he is far from the father, and in the far country. He is now far from far country to field with pigs. He is now cut off from the presence of man to animal. Not just ordinary domestic animals, but “pigs”.

When we hear about pigs, what comes to your mind? Dirts!. Pigs are unclean animals. They are known for dirt. It feeds on dirty substances. Everything about it is dirty. Its body food, and environment is all dirty. It has terrible odor that even from a distance it irritates. And that is why it is not usually around the house, but fields. Because of its irritating odor, it is not reared near the house. It does not eat fresh cud like other domestic animals. Rather it feeds on spoilt ones. It was this pig that this young man was sent to the fields to go and feed. His knew available occupation was to feed the pigs to feed the pigs was to live in deaths. His nature will now be dirtiness. Even when he bathes, he would still live in dirtiness because his new job is with pigs. Staying with pigs implies that he will inevitably be radiating the same kind of Pig’s odour. He cannot dodge the smell of pig for his living was with pigs to feed them. What a terrible state!

If you hire yourself to a citizen of the country, the best he can do for you is to send you far away from both the father and fellow man, and it is to an unclean life and your state will be worst.
There are young girls who were in need of help and they thought that employees, lecturers or uncle’s will help them and they hired themselves to them, and they rendered their lives useless the more. some have not recovered from such shock till date.

A girl came to see me some time ago telling me of how a young man promise to love and marry her and because she thought that her need was marriage. So she hired her heart to this young man. One day, this young man “claimed” to be sick like Amnon and went to hospital. There, he called this girl that he was sick. The girl went to see him and took care of him in the hospital. When he was discharged, they got home in the evening of that day. Later, the girl told him that she wanted to go home because it was already late. But the young man pretended to be very sick and pleaded with her not to leave him that night, seeing how severe his condition was and was all alone. So the girl, though compassionate but sensing danger in her heart, possibly from God, asked him to promise her not to do anything “strange” in the night. If she was to stay with him. He immediately promised her he would not try such. How could he? Who is terribly sick, tries such, so the girl stayed behind that night to take care of him. She cooked for him and ensure that his drugs were administered to him accordingly. She was doing all this with all sincerity of heart to help.

But unfortunately she did not realize. That’s the man she hired herself, had his own need that he needed somebody to feed.  So late in the midnight or early morning, his need of sexual craving arose, seeking for gratification. He immediately recovered from the assumed sickness and pounced on this girl. The girl reminded him of his promise, but he told her that he has promised he will marry her. The girl pleaded all she could, but he overpowered her and slept with her violating her virginity that night.

According to her, the worst was not the incident of that night, but that later he threw her out of his house and warned her never to call his line in life again. Do you know what happened? She told me that from that point she made up her mind to waste her life. Since she has been violated.  She started sleeping from one Man to another. She became a pig. When she came to me, she came with tears, complaining and confessing her ugly ordeal, which I counseled and prayed with her.

When you hire your life to men, the best they can do is to send you to their fields to feed their pigs. No matter how good you think he may be, just wait until you hire yourself to him or her. You will discover that they have pigs, which they would want you to feed. The best they can do for you is to send you far away from far country to live with their pigs. They will turn your life into more miserable state. I want to plead with you again. Don’t hire yourself to any man, it is dangerous.

His purpose for deployment
 He longed to feed his stomach with pods that the pigs were eating.
The longing and desire of this young man for hiring himself to a citizen of that country was to feed his stomach with pods that. Pigs were eating. This is a clear description of the severe famine in the whole country. Food has finished. The only available food is pod that pigs were eating. This pod is even scarce, that was he was longing for it. He desired to eat pod and that was why he hired himself.

What is pod? Pod is dirty food? They are mixture of spoilt and decaying food. For example, it can be the mixture of spoilt beans, rice, garri, soup, fruit, with their peels, etc. Can you imagine such mixture? Actually, for men it is to be thrown to the dustbin. But that is a special meal for the pigs. Pigs enjoy such delicacy. When they see it, they dance and celebrate, feasting on it.

This young man had come to the point that his longing was to feed on the pod that pig were eating. It was his longing that drove him farther to field where pigs were. The only way to satisfy such a longing and desire is to go to the fields where pigs eat pods. pods are not kept in the house. Pods are found among the pigs.

Beloved, can I assure you that what drives your life to any particular destination is your desire? Your desire is a key to your preoccupation and environment. What you want to have, determine where and who you will become in life. If your desire is unclean, definitely, you will end up in an unclean activities, and environment. You go after porn, and immoral moneys because that is your longing. You become Doctor, Nurse, accountant, politician, Pastor missionary students, artisan etc. Because that is what you desire. No man becomes what he does not cherish or desire. Even when circumstances put you there, at the right time you will move out.

Your desire is the controlling factor of your life. You can only enjoy fornication, masturbation, gay or lesbian because first you are longing for it. Any food you don’t like when you are served with you will immediately reject and resist it. Even the odour might irritate you.

What are you longing for quietly in your heart?? If it is a pod then you will soon find someone who will send you to his fields to feed his pigs? If what fills your mind is lost or sexual thoughts, soon you will hire yourself to someone who would finish your body. If your desire is violence, then you are possibly a candidate for cultism. If your own is fashion, you may likely damage your body with unhealthy chemicals from cream. What is your longing?

 His Predicaments Of Deployment Luke 15:16
… He longed to fill his stomach with the pods that the pigs were eating, But no one gave him anything.

This is serious. Do you hear this? No one gave him anything. Even the citizens of the country who he hired himself out in order to fill his stomach could not give him anything. He was longing and expecting for pods that the pigs were eating, but no one gave him. Not even fellow servants. Not even friends. Not even neighbors. Not even his master. No one gave him anything.

His expectation was shattered. This is the worst state of his life. When even your least and last expectation, no one will give you. Can I let you know that in life no one can give you anything except your father? Your wishes and desires can only be attended to by your father. To every other man they want you to be, their slave feeding their pigs in their fields.

When the Son asked his father in the home “ me my share of estate” Immediately, the father divided his estate and gave it to him. But here in the far country, even when he had made himself a slave, serving all through the day and night under the sun and rain longing that he will fill his stomach with Pods, yet the result is “but no one gave him anything”.

Dearly beloved, do you know that the only person that can meet your genuine need in life is God? He cannot even give you pods. He will give you estates. The best man can do for you is to make you their slave. But God is your father who has all your need and delight in giving it to you. Once you ask him. Matthew 7: 7- 11.

Ask, and it shall be given you; seek, and ye shall find; knock, and it shall be opened unto you: For every one that asketh receiveth; and he that seeketh findeth; and to him that knocketh it shall be opened. Or what man is there of you, whom if his son ask bread, will he give him a stone? Or if he ask a fish, will he give him a serpent? If ye then, being evil, know how to give good gifts unto your children, how much more shall your Father which is in heaven give good things to them that ask him?

Why will you waste in far country? Why would you be a slave in the hands of men? Why would you be longing for pod while your Heavenly Father hold estates for? Why! Why‼ Why‼!
… He was starving to death
It is a time to think of the worst. The young son did come to his senses as he thought of the peril that awaits him - death. The fear of death brought him to his senses. He was starving and there was no one to give him anything. Even the pods pigs eat. And he knew the implication of this starvation. The starvation will lead to death. Its destination is death. Having not eaten for days, the body will starve to death.

For the first time, the younger son came to his sense of the destination of his life. He thought of his journey in life. that life, void of food will end in death. The only thing awaiting him was death in the far country. He would then choose to die in the far country or make another choice.

Beloved have you considered your eternal destination? Have you thought of where to end your life? Once you close your eyes for death, do you know if you do not make peace with God by receiving Jesus in your life whom God has made a propitiation for our sin? You will end in Eternal death. Any life without Christ is already condemned. Any life in Sin, its consequences is death. The wages of sin is death. Whenever sin is ruling, its destination is death. There is no option except you take decision to receive Jesus who is the life and bread of life. See what Jesus said in John 6:56

He that eateth my flesh, and drinketh my blood, dwelleth in me, and I in him.

Dear, why not rethink of your eternal destination, why not think of the implication of spending all your eternity in Hellfire forever and ever. Please think.










CHAPTER EIGHT
DAWNING OF THE PRODIGAL SON
 	Luke 15:17-20
	"When he came to his senses, he said, 'How many of my father's hired men have food to spare, and here I am starving to death! NIV
	"The son realized that he had been very foolish. He thought, 'All my father's hired workers have plenty of food. But here I am, almost dead because I have nothing to eat. ERV

There at the far country, not just far country but now far from far country into the fields with pigs. The young son was longing for someone to give him pods which pigs eat but no one gave him. Not even his friends who squandered his wealth with him. Not even his master who he hired himself unto. Not even the government of the far country could give him pods. No one gave him.

It was this predicament that brought him to “when he came to his senses.” This implies all the while he had left his senses. To come to his sense means the ability to perceive and be motivated by moral or ethical principles. It is the ability to make intelligent decisions or sound judgments. It is to arrive at good point, useful purpose or good reason.

One of the greatest challenges of this younger son was that he was not thoughtful. He did not give himself to thinking issues out before making decisions. He was just been moved by sight and emotions.

He goes for anything that charms his eyes. He was easily conquered by his emotions. He does not do things out of sound and purposeful judgment. Anything goes for him. Friends easily deceives him. In his buying things, he does not buy things of much value to his purpose in life. He does not make decisions based on the future but on the temporal present. He lived for today. He never even thought of his past. He does not learn from his past mistakes. The same mistake he made yesterday keeps repeating itself in his life yet, hardly takes corrections.

When he came to himself, he had to make a sensible decisions. It was time to make certain changes that will turn around everything in his destiny. As we x-ray the decisions of this prodigal son, may it become a mirror to reflect your own life.

It was a time to remember the Father
The life of this younger son began with the father. It was the father that brought him forth. When he had need, he went to the father. The father was the source of his all in all. His inheritance was given to him by the father. the father was his source of life and living. The only person who had the sole responsibility of taking care of him was the father. Whatever he would become in life was through the father. However, once he received the portion of his estate from the father, he gathered all and set off for the distant country.

Every of his danger and predicament in life began when he lost the presence of the father who was his source of and in life. He was far from the father who would have taken care of him and supplied all he needed for him to enjoy. The severe famine only was in the whole country of the far country. It did not affect the father and the family.

Coming to ourselves and senses is remembering our heavenly Father- the source. As long as a man is not thinking of God, he is outside himself and is foolish. See psalm


The first and greatest folly of life is ignorance of God. Every other folly spring from a life ignorance of God. And that is why bible defines that the beginning of wisdom is the fear of God. A man may be a professor yet doing and manifesting foolish characters at times. Can you imagine a professor of sixty year almost a grandpa, raping a girl of fourteen year? What is it? Folly!

Do you know that you are senseless when you forget your heavenly Father? Even if you are the most intelligent student of your time, you are outside your senses. Because definitely you will perish in hell with all your distinctions. The destination of every man in far country is death. After the severe famine, comes death. But thank God before the death could come the younger son came to his senses.

Beloved, are you waiting for death to come before you will remember your heavenly Father? Remember there is no repentance in grave. Anything you cannot do now in the land of the living is gone. Eternity is a place for reward and punishment. Death is a transition and exit into eternity to go and receive the reward of all you did while you had the opportunity of living. Why not think of this heavenly Father who created you in His image. God who gave you life, gave His Son to die for you sins, who have been protecting and providing for you all you needed in life. The One that gave you sound health, intelligence, good physiology, psyche and talents. Why must you die in far country while there is all you needed with the Father? Why not come to you senses today and return to God with all your heart? He is waiting for you!

It was a time of deep reflection
For the first time this young son talked to himself. Al the while he has been talking to men. He has been listening and following the inclineation of his sinful nature. His eyes, ears, and emotions have been his guide bur never spoken to “Himslef.” The first opportunity he has when severe famine struck far country he hired himself. But now he wants to setle down to think abount himself.

The greatest challenge of man especially an average youth is “Thinking.” Man by nature hardly thinks. To think means to critically look on issues considering its pros and cons before any concrete decision. To think means to consider the past, present and future. It is to compare the value of today and the face value of tomorrow.

Young people hardly thinks. He is only interested in what gives him momentary joy without considering the consequencies. He hardly ask the right questions- why?, what? When? Who? And how? He is easily conquered by his selfish desires.

It was time of reasoning issues
Immediately he came to himself he immediately compared what happened in the oast at his father’s house and what is happening to him in the far country. He reasoned carefully on the past advantages and present disadvantages. For the first time he asked the right question, “How many of my father’s hired servants have food to spare.” That’s a good reasoning.

A man who does not take time to sit to evaluate his past can hardly see the future. As long as you are only interested in the present, your situation will continue to be the same.

It was a time to reevaluate Luke 15:17
He said, ‘How many of my father’s hired men have food to spare, and here I am starving to death! NIV

It was a time for this young son correctly reevaluates his situations. He remembered that in his house that the hired men have enough food to eat but even the one to spare. In his father’s house food was not a problem at all even to the slaves. Slaves were eating as they wanted. They eat good sumptuous meals. They eat three times a day and still have excess left.

But for him in the far country, he was starving to death. He was not looking for food but ponds left over by the pigs. Even such ponds no one was willing to give him. Coming to his senses, is considering things in practical analysis. All the while, his eyes and mind have been on his predicaments in far country. Once he lifted up his eyes from far country, he saw alternative hope in his father’s house. He saw that far country is not the end of the road. There is still hope in his father’s house.

In comparison, two of them can never be the same. His present need was food but in his father’s house even hired servants had food enough to enjoy. Food was among the least challeng of the father’s house. It not considered as a need. It is a basic necessity the father provides for every member of his house including the slaves.

Beloved, would you not come to your senses today. Will you not pause to think and analyse what God holds for you as his child and what you are passing through because of sin.
CHAPTER NINE
DECISION OF THE PRODIGAL SON
 	Luke 15:18
I will set out and go back to my father and say to him: Father, I have sinned against heaven and against you. NIV

His Decision Was Personal - I will
Having come to himself he now took a decision on what next to do. It was a personal decision. No body coarse him into doing what he want to do. He said, “I” will rise. Even though people in far country were in severe famine but he is now deciding to make a roundabout turn. He want to be personal in dealing with his challenge. Even if others are not doing anything about their situation for him he is tired. He has discovered his real need and is ready to go about it.

His Decision Was Practical - I will set out, rise
He determined what to do. It was not a mere decision. It was a decision on what to do immediately. He said he will arise. Possibly he has been sitting down or lying down in laziness. He was realizing that his position must now change. He is no longer to continue in the manner in which he has been. He needed to arise for action. He needed to do something different. The status quo must change. It must not be game as usual. He needs to take a radical decision about his life. He is no longer contented with his state and he must not continue in it. He must do something urgent in order to deal with it and that thing was to rise.

What and where do you need to rise? Is there any position you are in which is not compatible with the purpose of God? This young son’s position was in the fields with the pigs. When he realized himself he decided to get out from that state. He decided to make a shift outside such an ugly and ungodly environment. Where do you need to get out from? Do you need to get out from lesbian or homosexual practice? Do you need to get out from stealing or cultism? Do you need to get out from fornication and masturbation?

His decision was Purposeful 	I will go back to my father
We have seen in our previous studies that the decision of the younger son was personal and practical. Here again, we are seeing that his decision was purposeful. His decision was to go back to his father. He knew where he missed it, and his decision was to go back there. He said “I will go back to my father” It was not to any other person but the father. The one person he offended and broke his heart was his father. The person he had squandered his wealth was his father. The person he had cut off from his communion was his father. Hence, his decision was to go back to his father.

 His greatest problem began when he separated from his father. a journey outside the father will end up in misery.  No matter how pleasant, enticing, or lucrative it might seem. The end will be catastrophic. And the only way to deal with such dilemma was to retrace back to the father. The father is the source and owner of all we need. If we collect small from him and run away from him, definitely that small will one day finish and we will begin to be in want. Even to the point of starving to death.

If this younger son could remember that and decides to go back to his father. What about me? Will I not rise immediately to go back to my Heavenly Father? I have left him since by my wicked and wayward life. I live contrary to his laws and life. I disobeyed his instructions. Instead of pleasing him, I am pleasing myself. The young son said “I will go back to my father”. Even though I have gone away from him. He is still my father no matter what. He is my father.

His Decision was Pathetic
I will say to him: Father, I have sinned against heaven I have sinned against you.

His decision was not just to go back to his father. It was to go back to his father to confess his wrongs and sin against him. He realized his sinfulness against his father. And his decision was to to go confess his short comings before him. He realized that he had offended his father. Even if he has not offended any other person he had offended his father who gave him everything but he went to the far country squandered everything. No father can endure or bear such a great loss and still be happy. The son knew in him that what he did to his father was very wrong and he therefore set forth to go and plead for his forgiveness.

He knew that the bridge for coming back to his back is through repentance and confession. Confession is one of the evidence of repentance. It is the pouring out of what is going on in the heart. For out of the abundance of the heart the mouth speaks. Confession is accepting that one is wrong. That one has realized his mistakes and is ready to adjust.

Beloved, have you actually realized that by the way you have been living you have displeased your heavenly Father? He has given you life, wisdom, intelligence, beauty, handsome, sound health, admission, marriage, parents, etc. Yet you have been living contrary to His instructions? Would you not make your confession to Him today? Would you not take such a pathetic decision to confess all your wrong to your heavenly Father?

I have sinned Luke.15.21
The son said to him, ‘Father, I have sinned against heaven and against you. I am no longer worthy to be called your son.
One of the best way to easily find our way back to God is the realization, confession, and admission of our sinfulness. Our restoration from God comes once we realize that we have sinned. And this the younger son did. He did not just realize that he had sin against his father, but even heaven. In fact, he began by saying that he had sinned against heaven, which means God.
There are two persons our sin affects- God and man. The first is God before man. If we do not realize that we have sinned against God, we will hardly realize we have sinned against man. It is only as we look at the holiness of God that we can see how we have fallen in our relation to Him and man
Joseph knew this when he was tempted by Potiphar’s wife. His words were, “How can I do this wicked thing against God” God was his first priority. It was his fear for God that made him to respect man. He did not first of his master Potiphar. It was his reverence for God that brought his respect for man.
Any man who does not realize his sinfulness to God would not see any fault in sinning against man.
“I have sinned against heaven” was the confession of this younger son. What is your own? Have you realized your sinfulness against God? Have you come to realize that all your disobedience are first to God? That your stealing, malpractice, cultism, homosexuality, fornication, etc. are first against God? What shall be your response now? Would you not bring your confession to your heavenly father whom you have broken his heart? He’s waiting for your confession. Do it now before you continue reading!
I am not worthy Luke.15.19 –
I am no longer worthy to be called your son; make me like one of your hired men.’
Not just that, this younger son realised his sinfulness against heaven and his father. He also realised his unworthiness of Sonship. He quickly realised that  sin brings unworthines, sin denies one of privileges and rights before the father. He knew the penalty of sin. That sin removes glory from Son And makes him a slave. Everyone who commits sin is a slave of sin. It does not matter who he is.
 Jesus in John 8 told the Jews who were claiming that there were children of Abraham, that they were actually slaves. It ws sin that made them slaves. Sin is a tyrant master. You can’t be a child of God and a servant of sin at the same time. It is either. You are a child of God who is led by the spirit of God or a slave dominated and ruled by sin.
The son sincerely admitted “I am no longer worth to be called your son”. What is sober reflection and realisation. He State and condition unveiled to him what and who he is now. Though Son was sin has degraded him to a servant. He is known in Company of pigs. In a field. At far country. He was a servant. He knew it. All that belonged to him from his father. He had collected them and squandered them.
Sin dishonours, disgraces, and deprives a son of his sonship. Reuben lost his firstborn right and position because of sin. He slept with his fathers wife. Absolom lost his life because of sin. Esau Lost his position as first son because of his profanity. A son who lives in sin is on the way to dishonour.
Man was crowned with honour and glory in creation but sin marred that glory. And since after the fall man became Ichabod. It is only in Christ that the glory and honour is restored again. Are you not going to be realistic to evaluate yourself? To see the place you have fallen. What sin has deprived, dishonour or disgrace you? Would you not realise your unworthines and cried to God for restoration? Now is still the time.
Make Me Luke 15:19
I am no longer worthy to be called your son; make me like one of your hired men.' NIV

When the younger son initially went to his father his request was, “Give me” the portion of estate that belong to me. But now he had come to himself and senses his request has changed. The last time he met his father it was to receive something from him but now he want to serve. His request now was, “Make me” like one of your hired men.

He now realized that what he needed was a making. Though a son yet, he needed to be a servant. He needed to serve his father. For it is in service that he will learn wisdom and knowledge to administer his inheritance from the father well. His request that the father will make him like one of his hired servant implied that he was accepting to become a servant. And to become a servant there is something that must be done to a servant for him to serve correctly. The father makes his hired servants. The son wanted the father to make him as a servant. It was “make me.” He now realized there is need for a making. That though he is a son but if he will serve his fathers purpose and pleasure then his father must make him.

He must submit to the making of the father. He must allow the discipline of the father to form him. He must accepts that the father will instruct and correct him in all things. He must accept to be a disciple of his father like every other hired servant.

This time around the making was voluntary. It was not the father that coerced him into the making. It was of his personal decision and volition. It was right at the far country that he took the decision. The decision was by no means influence by a threat or force. The younger son having come to evaluate his past and present came to a conclusion that the only thing in his advantage was to go back to his father and allow him to make him into a servant.

Again, by this we are seeing a choice to be humble. It was pride that took him out of his father. Now it is humility that is bringing him back to the father.

One of the ways God uses to mould us into matured sons is hardship and sufferings of life. He denies us some basic necessities of life in order to bring our attention to Himself and to teach us sympathy and prudence in life. When we do not pass through such things we can not understand others and we will not appreciate the love and graciousness of our Father. That is why Heb 12:7-11 says;

Endure hardship as discipline; God is treating you as sons. For what son is not disciplined by his father? If you are not disciplined (and everyone undergoes discipline), then you are illegitimate children and not true sons. Moreover, we have all had human fathers who disciplined us and we respected them for it. How much more should we submit to the Father of our spirits and live! Our fathers disciplined us for a little while as they thought best; but God disciplines us for our good, that we may share in his holiness. No discipline seems pleasant at the time, but painful. Later on, however, it produces a harvest of righteousness and peace for those who have been trained by it. NIV

When the younger son came to his senses he realized that one of the things he missed with the father was his making. The father has been making other hired servants but he himself was not made. And that was what had brought all these calamities in his life. He thought that life was all about mere wishes. But the experience in far country has thought him otherwise. That one needs preparation from the father if one will survive all life weather. An unprepared man cannot meet up with the challenges and demand of life. Every man who will conquer life and its challenges must be well prepared by the father. Such that no matter wherever he might be he would be well equipped to face every challenge.

The younger son became a slave in far country and was about to starve to death in that land because he has no training of the father. If you have opportunity to meet your heavenly Father again, what do you think would be you greatest request from Him? Is it “Give me or Make me?” what you ask will determine your destination at the long run. If the younger son had begun his request with “Make me” he would not have ended the way he did in far country. His father would have made him into a correct son and servant serving both God and men wherever he finds himself even if in a far country.

What is your own request today? You are the one who is coming to your heavenly Father. As a young person what would you ask God at this point of your life? Do you think it is “Give me” or “Make me?” the choice is yours!

COST OF GOING BACK TO THE FATHER Luke.15.20
So he got up and went to his father. "But while he was still a long way off, his father saw him and was filled with compassion for him; he ran to his son, threw his arms around him and kissed him.
When the younger son came to his senses, he really took time to think and evaluate himself and his state. From that analysis, he then took a decision of what to do. One of the things he realised was his need of his father, love and relationship. He decided to go back to his father.
 We here saw that his decision was not just a mere wishe. “He got up and went to his father”. His decision was manifested in a practical response. He did not postpone his decision. Once he noted that his greatest need was his father without delay, he rose and went to his father.
What his decision cost him?
-	It cost him his new found job in a far country. In order to go back to the father, he must resign from such an ungodly company and business that does not bring glory to the father. No more feeding of swine.
-	It cost his friends in the far country. Once he turned to gocountry.Once he turned to go back to the father automatically, he chooses to lose all his friends in the far country.
-	It cost him pleasures of far country. Far country is a place of squandering life in riotous or wild living. It is a place men live like animals. There is no control and restriction or restraint. Taking the decision to go back to the father will make him to say bye-bye to such life.
When a man chose to return to the heavenly father, it will cost him so many things such as ungodly friends, ungodly occupations and sinful life. Anyone who is not yet ready to let go of all these is not fit to miss the father

CHAPTER TEN
THE DARLING FATHER
WHILE HE WAS A GRET WAY OFF
 Luke 15:20
But while he was still a long way off, his father saw him and was filled with compassion for him; he ran to his son, threw his arms around him and kissed him. NIV

There in the far country the younger son decided that he would arise and go back to his father to confess of his unworthiness and sinfulness and still to ask him to make him one of his servant. Not just that he thought of it he also arose and went back to his father.

It was now on his journey back home while he was still a long way off, that his father saw him. He has not gotten to the home. He was still a long distance yet the father saw him. He was still very far but he was on journey out of the far country. He has left al in order to go back to his father. His single aim was to go back to his father.

While he was still a long way off the father saw him. It was only his father that saw him. No other person saw him. Possibly, even if other people saw him they might not recognize him. Yet his father saw him and recognized him while he was still a long way off.

That he saw him while a long way off could imply that he saw his decision. He saw his determined effort to return to his father. He saw his realization of his sinfulness and unworthiness. He saw his brokenness of heart. He saw his repentant heart. He saw his humble heart to be made a servant.

It was “him” that the father saw. The father did not saw his mistakes and waste. He did not see all he had lost in the far far country. He did not see things but him. He saw the son as he was.

 	HIS FATHER SAW HIM	Luke 15:20
But while he was still a long way off, his father saw him and was filled with compassion for him; he ran to his son, threw his arms around him and kissed him. NIV

As the younger son began to implement his choice of going back home to the father, while he was still a long way off his father saw his father saw him. It was his father that first saw him. It was not him that saw his father first. That is to say possibly the father has been looking with all expectation for his return. He knew in himself that the son will one day return home. His love will one day compel him back home. He knew that a day will come when he will be in need of the father again. He knew that it was only him who knows and can provide and supply all his needs. No one else can love and take care of him like the father. There is no place like home. He can never receive warmth treatment elsewhere like the home. Home is the best place to be. Wherever else he might be he will be a stranger or servant. His sonship is only in the home. Outside the presence of the father he is no longer a son, the highest he can be is a stranger, slave or a citizen but not a son.

The father knowing all these his impending situations of the younger son was therefore out looking in earnest hope for the returning of his son one day. Within him he knew that his son will one day return. Though practically and physically lost but in his heart the younger son was still alive.

And this very day his hope and expectation did come to pass. While the son was still a long way off his father saw him. He saw him not when he has gotten home. It was when he was still very far. He saw him when he was still dirty. He recognized him.

The father’s eyes are always out looking for us. No matter how far we may be His eyes and heart are upon us. We might not see him but he is seeing us.

HIS FATHER WAS FILLED WITH COMPASSION Luke 15:20
But while he was still a long way off, his father saw him and was filled with compassion for him; he ran to his son, threw his arms around him and kissed him. NIV

Another attitude we saw of the father of the prodigal son was compassion. He was a compassionate father. Compassion is to have the bowels yearn, i.e. feel sympathy, to pity. It is sympathy for the suffering of others, often including a desire to help.

Sympathy is the capacity to share feelings with others. It is the ability to enter into, understand, or share somebody else's feelings. It is the feelings of somebody who enters into or shares another's feelings. It is the feeling or expression of pity or sorrow for the pain or distress of somebody else. It is the inclination to think or feel the same as somebody else. It is seeing or experiencing together with others their pains and sorrow which drives the bowels to help.

The father did not just see the younger son. He could feel intimately along with the son. He saw the predicaments he has gone through. He was sorry for him. He imagined the suffering he must have passed through outside the watch of the father. He saw how lonely and rejected he would have experienced in the far country. He could look at him and saw hunger ad helplessness. He saw along with him the lostness and loneliness in the face of the son.

The fathers’ bowels moved when he saw the son. All his being moved as if it was him that was in that situation. He did not just see the predicament of the son. He could imagine himself in such condition. He saw the starvation all over the son. He saw the failures all over him. He saw discouragement, depression and disappointment all around him.

Father thank you because you have seen me as I am. My predicament, failures, and disappointment is never far from your eyes. I know your heart is moving towards my predicaments. Every of my steps is not without your loving watch. I know you will soon show me mercy.

In the same way help me to be compassionate to your people. Help me to enter them to feel and understand them as to help them in their predicaments.

HIS FATHER RAN TO HIM  	Luke 15:20
But while he was still a long way off, his father saw him and was filled with compassion for him; he ran to his son, threw his arms around him and kissed him. NIV

The next thing the father did as he saw the younger son was that he ran to his son. When he saw him from afar he did not wait for him to come to the house. It was the father that first ran after him. For the fact that he saw him on a step back home he ran after him.

Running implied that he moved rapidly on foot so that both feet are momentarily off the ground in each step. He was in a haste to receive the son back home. He was surprised that the son was back home. He ran to go and help. It was a running of joy and welcome.

This is a confirmation of the word of God for us saying, “Draw near unto me and I will draw near unto you.” God is always waiting for our step back to him and he can run after us. It gives Him joy to see us in His kingdom. No matter what He is doing there is joy in heaven over one soul that returns home to the Father. Not just that is eyes and heart was after us His leg is rushing after us.

Father thank you because your all is after me even while I am still a far distance you are running after me.

HIS FATHER THREW HIS HANDS AROUND HIM  	Luke 15:20
But while he was still a long way off, his father saw him and was filled 	with compassion for him; he ran to his son, threw his arms around him 	and kissed him. NIV

This is lovely. The father ran to his son not to condemn him but to express unconditional love to him. It was a hands of love and welcome. In today's contemporary language it is to hug him. To hug means to put your arms around somebody's body and hold the person tight to show affection or pleasure. Hugging is a sign of love to someone dear to ones heart. You hug the person you are happy with. He hugged him not minding his state. Not minding his dirty state and odor from pig pen. He hugged him not counting the waste of his resources. He hugged him nothing minding he was no longer worthy to be his son. He threw his arms around him.

God who is our Father is love. His love for us is unconditional and unconquerable. He has determined before the world began to love us. And nothing could stop Him from loving us. Not even sis can stop Him. In fact, it was while we were sinners that He gave His Son to come and die for our sins. It was for the lost that the Son came and put on mortality to search for the lost ones. His hands is waiting for our returning to Him. He is ready and willing to received us to Himself no matter how dirty or sinful we may be, His holy hands cannot is ever waiting to receive us.

But we cannot experience this holy and gracious hands in the far country. It can only be experienced in the fathers presence. It was when the younger son took the decision to go  back to the father that he began to see this lovely Hands again.

HIS FATHER KISSED HIM  	Luke 15:20
But while he was still a long way off, his father saw him and was filled 	with compassion for him; he ran to his son, threw his arms around him 	and kissed him. NIV

Kiss is to touch somebody or something with the lips, either gently or passionately. It a sign of love or greeting. It is an expression of the heart of love. It is a deeper act of a loving relationship.

Songs 1:2
Let him kiss me with the kisses of his mouth —
for your love is more delightful than wine. NIV

The father kissed the son to once again shower him love. To show him how dear he was in heart he was looking for opportunity to express what was going on in his heart who just returned from a far country.

Hugging and kissing are all sign of deep intimate relationship and expression of love to one another. It is only done to a friend or family member. There is a kiss that comes from the father. Not from any other source. Have I experienced the kiss of the gracious saviour? Have I entered into a deeper relationship with Him?

QUICK! BRING THE BEST ROBE Luke 15:22
•	"But the father said to his servants, 'Quick! Bring the best robe and put it on him. Put a ring on his finger and sandals on his feet. NIV
•	"But the father wasn't listening. He was calling to the servants, 'Quick. Bring a clean set of clothes and dress him. Put the family ring on his finger and sandals on his feet. MSG

The first word we are noting in this verse is “But.” but a word of contrast. It changes what was said or did before. What happened before was that the younger son was confessing to the father of his unworthiness as his son because of his sin. He was trying to show his father that he did not come to become his son again but to be his servant because he has seen himself a servant. Right there in the far country he was a servant and it was to be a servant that he has come back home.

It was while he was still in this confession that the word “but” came in. There was an interruption by the father. According to the message bible translation it says “But the father wasn’t listening. Instead he was calling the servants. When the father then spoke up, it was not of condemnation. He spoke not even to the son but the servants.

He said, Quick, hurry or fast bring the best robe or a clean set of clothes. The father wanted it quick. He ask the servants to attend to that matter with every urgency. He does not want delay in handling the matter. The first thing the father asked the servants to bring quickly was the best clothes. This implies that the son was wearing a dirty clothes. Not just dirty but tattered. And it was an eye sore to the father. It was a disgrace for the father. How can his son be putting on such can of filthy clothe. The disgrace is not just to the son but the father. When people see the son they will ask whose son is this? And the name of the father will be mentioned.

In order to avoid such dishonor and discredit the father asked the servants to quickly get a clean new set of clothe to change him. While he was busy talking to the father the father was busy talking to the servants for a changing of his clothing. He was not the one that requested for the changing of the clothes. It was the father. The father knows what the son needs at every point in time. The son was asking to be at servant be a servant but the father was preparing him to be a son. Though in his mind he has chosen to be servant but the father has as well chosen him to be a son.

All these shows us the attitude of our loving heavenly Father who is in a haste to receive us back to Himself. He does not condemn us when we come to Him. Rather He is in a haste to change us into His own image as His sons. He wants to restore us into His image and nature. Sin might have rubbished us and made us unclean but it the business of the father to make us clean and restore us into sonship again. On our own we can do nothing. But once we come to Him in repentance His immediate attention is to change us into the image of His son. Right there in the far country He cannot do it. But once we are in His presence He takes the responsibility of making us His son. No matter how dirty we might be, in the presence of the Father He will make us clean without delay. There is always clean clothes available to change us. The clean clothes are ready waiting in the fathers presence. It is only for the servants to bring it and put it upon the son.

Do you know that there is a robe waiting for me in the Fathers presence? If only I can return to Him there is a clean and glorious robe waiting for me in His presence. But I can only access it through repentance and confession.

Lord help me never to die in my sin while you have for me a clean robe to change me into your image

THE BEST FATHER WITH THE BEST ROBE  	Luke 15:22
"But the father said to his servants, 'Quick! Bring the best robe and put it on him. Put a ring on his finger and sandals on his feet. NIV

Here we see the magnanimous and prodigal heart of the father. The father is a giver. The younger son had wasted all that the father gave him as his portion in a far country. He is back again to the family, at seeing him the father was filled with joy. Instead of asking him how he managed what he gave to him which he has wasted he asked his servants to quickly bring the best robe.

The father gives the best and the perfect gift of life. In the far country the younger son was looking for who to give him pigs food but no one gave it to him. But here the father wants to clothe him with the best robe. It was not a second hand clothe. Though he has divided his estate among the two sons yet there is the best still remaining. He is rich. He is inexhaustible. His riches are immeasurable and incalculable. No matter how prodigal the son could be the father is inexhaustible. The father first is the prodigal. He gives recklessly without reserve. His desire is to give. All that the son needs the father is ready to give. He gives the one that the sons ask and the ones they did not ask.

It was not the son that requested this best robe. His was just confession while the father was busy arranging his change of raiment with the best robe. When the father wants to give he gives the best. He gives what no other one can beat. What the father gives is not beaten in quantity by no other.

God is the generous giver who cannot be tired of giving. No matter how wasteful we might be it cannot affect the glorious riches of God. If we waste the life he gives to us he is still ready to give more life even His eternal life which is the best. If we waste our body in sin when we return to Him again he still has new body to give unto us. There is nothing we can waste and the Father does not still have the best to still give us when we return to Him. There is still the best robe, life, wealth, intelligent, health, etc. With the Father for us if only we can return to Him.

THE BEST ROBE Luke 15:22
"But the father said to his servants, 'Quick! Bring the best robe and put it on him. Put a ring on his finger and sandals on his feet. NIV

A robe is a long loose garment worn on ceremonial occasions or as a symbol of authority, especially by the judiciary, academics, and members of the clergy. A robe is a special clothes for a special activity or event by a special persons. A robe is not worn always. It is worn during a special occasion or celebration. It is worn in a time of joy. It is worn to display glory, honor and dignity.

A robe is specially designed to reveal beauty. It is usually costly. Its texture and colour are usually unique. It is mainly meant for the rich or those in authority e.g kings, princes and priests. It is designed to distinguished them from other people. It shows their state of dignity and honor.

A robe is not only for honour and glory it is also for covering. It covers nakedness. Anyone who is wearing a robe is not under the shame of nakedness.

In all these we that it was the father who requested that the servants should bring the best robe and put it on the son. The question now is why? Why was the best robe the first thing the father requested to be brought and put on the son. Why not food? Why not drinks?

1. It was because the son was wearing ragged clothing
2. It was because he wants to restore him to the place of glory and honor

Sin makes a man fall short of the glory of God. But Christ is the hope of glory. It is only the righteousness of Christ that can clothe and cover our nakedness and filthiness. The best God can do for a man is to clothe him with the righteousness of Christ. This is what is called justification. Though we are sinners but when we believe in the atoning sacrifice of Jesus we are counted righteous before God. The best robe that our heavenly Father can give to any of His son who returns home through repentance and confession is to clothe him/her with the righteousness of Christ.

Rom 1:17
For in the gospel a righteousness from God is revealed, a righteousness that is by faith from first to last, just as it is written: "The righteous will live by faith."	NIV

Phil 3:9-10
 and be found in him, not having a righteousness of my own that comes from the law, but that which is through faith in Christ — the righteousness that comes from God and is by faith. NIV

LET’S HAVE FEAST AND CELEBRATE 	Luke 15:23
Bring the fattened calf and kill it. Let's have a feast and celebrate. NIV

Having asked the servants to bring the best robe, ring and sandals to be put on the son the father now request that the fattened calf be killed. In the robe it was the best robe. Here it is “fattened calf” that is to be killed. The father always goes for the best for the son. All he gives is the best and the fattest. And it is to the prodigal son he is doing all these for. It was the son that have wasted his resources in the far country that he is doing all these things for.

The essence of bringing and killing the fattest calf is to have feast and celebrate. We are again noting the kind of person of this father. He feasts and celebrates. He expresses his joy with feasting and celebration.

Feasting is an elaborate meal for many people that celebrates an occasion. Celebration is to show happiness that something good or special has happened by doing such things as eating and drinking together or playing music. A meal that demands the killing of a calf is not a small feast. Feast is not a meal for the family members. It is for a large number of people. Possibly the father invited neighbors, friends and relatives to celebrate with him.

Let’s have a feast and celebrate was the initiation of the father. Nobody coaxed or suggested it to him. It was out of the joy in his heart. Feasting and celebration are outflow and expression of the inner joy. No man in sorrow or pains celebrates. He can only be mourning. May be in the past he was mourning but the presence of his son has brought joy to his heart. He was not feasting and celebrating because of any other thing but simply that his son was back home.

My relationship with God gives him joy. Not just the day I come to repentance as a sinner even on daily bases He is glad in my presence with me. He delight in me being with Him.

Lord, help me to always make it a point of responsibility and priority to always be in your presence for this gives you joy and is worth celebrating.

LET’S HAVE FEAST AND CELEBRATE 	Luke 15:23
Bring the fattened calf and kill it. Let's have a feast and celebrate. NIV

Having asked the servants to bring the best robe, ring and sandals to be put on the son the father now request that the fattened calf be killed. In the robe it was the best robe. Here it is “fattened calf” that is to be killed. The father always goes for the best for the son. All he gives is the best and the fattest. And it is to the prodigal son he is doing all these for. It was the son that have wasted his resources in the far country that he is doing all these things for.

The essence of bringing and killing the fattest calf is to have feast and celebrate. We are again noting the kind of person of this father. He feasts and celebrates. He expresses his joy with feasting and celebration.

Feasting is an elaborate meal for many people that celebrates an occasion. Celebration is to show happiness that something good or special has happened by doing such things as eating and drinking together or playing music. A meal that demands the killing of a calf is not a small feast. Feast is not a meal for the family members. It is for a large number of people. Possibly the father invited neighbors, friends and relatives to celebrate with him.

Let’s have a feast and celebrate was the initiation of the father. Nobody coarse or suggested it to him. It was out of the joy in his heart. Feasting and celebration are outflow and expression of the inner joy. No man in sorrow or pains celebrates. He can only be mourning. May be in the past he was mourning but the presence of his son has brought joy to his heart. He was not feasting and celebrating because of any other thing but simply that his son was back home.

My relationship with God gives him joy. Not just the day I come to repentance as a sinner even on daily bases He is glad in my presence with me. He delight in me being with Him.

Lord help me to always make it a point of responsibility and priority to always be in your presence for this gives you joy and is worth celebrating.

DEAD BUT ALIVE		Luke 15:24
For this son of mine was dead and is alive again; he was lost and is found.' So they began to celebrate. NIV

The whole essence of celebration was because of this son of the father. Not minding what the son has done and how wayward he was he was still the son of his father. The father still recognized him as his son. Instead of condemning or rejecting him he is celebrating him. Why? Because of love. For him the son was dead. His conclusion was that “this son of mine was dead.”

What made him to be dead? Life outside the presence of the father is dead. There is no life without the father. Any life lived outside the father is a useless life. So when the son set out to live the father for a far country it was a journey into death. Though alive but he was dead. It is only in the presence of the father that the son can have real life. It is only the father that knows what is good for the son. The father is the source of all that the son would need. If the son is not in the presence of the father how can he survive? A new born baby that is not with the mother to be feed how can the baby survive? The mother is the source of life for that baby.

The father said, “For this son of mine was dead and is alive again.” outside the father was dead. In the presence of the father is life. He is alive again because he is back in the presence of the father.

This is the same between man and God. Life outside the presence of God is death. For in Him is life and that life is the life of men. It does not matter what a man claim to be life, once it is outside the presence of God for heaven it is death. It does not matter the person and the glory of enjoyment he might be experiencing, for God it is death. Death is absence of life and God is life. Absence of God is death. The worst death is not absence of the breath of life but absence of life Himself- God. Any life that does not have life is death.

God has given the Son power to give that life to men. All who believe in Him will have eternal life- the very life of God. This new life comes to someone when he/she hears the gospel and accepts it by repenting and renouncing of his sins. At this point of conversion God will give him/her a new heart of the flesh which is the new life through His Holy Spirit.

Lord thank you for giving me the eternal life through Jesus Christ who died for my sins and was raised for my new life. Help me to consciously walk in conscious of this new and eternal life and to continually live in your presence because life outside your presence is death.

LOST BUT FOUND  	Luke 15:24
For this son of mine was dead and is alive again; he was lost and is found.' So they began to celebrate. NIV

As we saw that life outside the presence of the father is death. Again life outside the father is a lost life. When something is said to be lost it means it can not be found or not at reach or missing. Anything that is lost may be important but is of no use because is no longer  available for usage. Though a son but is lost and is of no use to the father and the family.

According to the father though he was “this son of mine” yet he was dead and lost. From this we can see that a son can be alive yet dead. In the heart of the father though still in existence but he is lost in the fathers heart. What determines the condition of a son before the father is his position or environment. Everyone in the far country is dead and lost before the father. But anyone in the presence of the father is alive and useful.

The same is between us and God. What defines our state before Him at any time is our environment. Every natural man born of the tribe of Adam is dead in sin and lost.

Eph. 2:1,4-5
As for you, you were dead in your transgressions and sins,… But because of his great love for us, God, who is rich in mercy, 5 made us alive with Christ even when we were dead in transgressions — it is by grace you have been saved.	NIV

2 Cor 5:17
Therefore, if anyone is in Christ, he is a new creation; the old has gone, the new has come!		NIV

It is only in Christ Jesus that there is a change of condition and position. Though dead or lost when a man comes into Christ he/she becomes a new creation man. God makes him alive through His Holy Spirit. This takes place when one sincerely confesses, repents and renounces his sins.

Father thank you though dead and lost in sin but in Christ Jesus you have found me and made alive with Him through your Holy Spirit.

IN THE FIELD OR WITH THE FATHER 	Luke 15:25
"Meanwhile, the older son was in the field. When he came near the house, he heard music and dancing.	NIV

Meanwhile implies at the same time as something is happening I.e when the celebration was going on. At the same time of celebration while others were eating, drinking and dancing the older son was in the field. He was in the field working. Though not in the far country but in the field of his father. The younger son was in the field of the far country but the older son was in the field of the father. The older son was serving the father. He was committed to the work of his father. His fathers occupation was his occupation. What was consuming him was his fathers field.

Though with the father but was not in the presence of the father. He was in the field. He was not in an intimate fellowship with the father. He was not there to discern the heart of the father. Though in the service of the father but not in the wish of the father. He does not know what was happening in the fathers house. His only interest was his fathers field. When his brother was back he was not aware. He also was far from the father. He was also lost but his lost was not in the far country but in the fathers field.

When he came near the house, he heard music and dancing. While in the field he heard nothing. It was when came near that he heard. It is only near the house that one can know what the father is doing. Far in the field you can never know what is happening. It was near in the house that the sound of music and dancing is heard.

The younger son left the father for far country to go and enjoy life but he never knew that right in his fathers presence there is celebration. In his fathers presence there is eating, drinking, music and dancing. He thought it can only be seen in the far country. The older son thought that all that can be gotten from the father is the field. All he knew about the father was his field. He never knew that the same father celebrates. When he came near the house he was surprise to hear music and dancing.

Thank God he came near the house. It is only as one comes near the house that he can know what is going on in the house. In the field we can hear nothing even though we are serving the interest of the father.

This is the experience of many children of God. We are sons but we are lost in activities and religion that we have no time for a personal intimate communion with the father. We are more committed to the field than to the father himself. We spend more of our time with the fathers field than with the father himself. Therefore, we end up not knowing the Father and what His will is. This makes us to have wrong or partial perspective of who the Father is. We only know one side of Him. It is only as we spend time with the heavenly Father that we can know Him to the fullest. If we are not always in His presence we will miss out of all the joy and celebration he has for His own. It is in His presence we know what He is doing at anytime.

Heavenly Father help me to be a man of your presence rather than a man of activities.

THE SON WHO DEPENDS ON THE SERVANT 	Luke 15:26
So he called one of the servants and asked him what was going on. NIV

Unfortunately, it was a servant that he called to inquire what was going in his fathers house. He was not patient to get into the house to talk to his father of the situation in the house. In his fathers house it was servants that give him information of what was happening. It seems he does not have personal intimate relationship with his father that could make him to know all that the father was doing. He is more comfortable to relate with servants than going straight to the father. He depends on the servants to receive information.

Though a son but it was servants that he was asking what was going on in the house. Even when he was near the house what stopped him from going into the house to ask the father?

Is this my case? How personal is my relationship with my heavenly Father? Am I receiving information or message directly from Him or I am depending on other servants of God for information about the kingdom of God? Am I aware of the agenda of heaven in my own time or my dependence is on what others say about my Fathers house? When I need information or message about the kingdom of my Father who do I go to or ask? Do I depend on books by other servants or do I go into the presence of my Father to receive His word for my life and generation?

Lord help me to personally pursue you than depending on men for information and message about you.


CELEBRATION FOR SAFE AND SOUND RETURNING Luke 15:27
'Your brother has come,' he replied, 'and your father has killed the fattened calf because he has him back safe and sound.	NIV

The boy said, 'Your brother has come back, and your father killed the best calf to eat. He is happy because he has his son back safe and sound.'

Here we are seeing the information the servant gave to the elder son. He told him that the celebration of eating, dancing and music was because his brother has come and his father has killed fatten calf because he has him back safe and sound. The father was celebrating because of the the return of the younger brother who returned.

The father was happy because he has his son back safe and sound. The father knew the implication of returning from far country safe and sound. Possibly many that have gone there died there in the far country. The younger son was already on the journey of death because he was longing for swine food but there was no one to gave it to him. And if there was no one to give him food the net thing is death. But fortunately for him he came to his senses and went back home. The father knew that him coming back from the far country was a great thing to celebrate because many who went there did not return home. And even at times those who returned have part of their bodies maimed. Far country normally render lives useless. Not just that it will sap all you came with but it will still disfigure or destroy the person.

This is the reason the father is rejoicing. Receiving his son safe and sound without deformity from the terrible far country calls for celebration. As we know that this is all about our heavenly Father. For any man to come out of this worldly system full of sin and darkness and turned to the kingdom of God brings a great celebration for God. Many are eternally lost. Many faith are even wounded. This world is a battle ground between evil and good over the souls of men. Heaven is doing every thing possible to woo men into His kingdom and hell is also labouring tirelessly to ensure that he entices men to himself for eternal destruction. So when a man returns to God there is a great rejoice because that is a great gain for the kingdom of God. The new Jerusalem will be filled with rejoicing and feasting for all the sons who were able to make it back home into the kingdom of God.

Father grant that I may be part of this eternal feasting in your kingdom for all your sons who returned safe and sound.

THE FATHER WHO UNDERSTANDS 	Luke 15:28
"The older brother became angry and refused to go in. So his father went out and pleaded with him. NIV

Yesterday we saw the folly and dominion of Mr. Anger. That anger can make someone to lose his inheritance or precious things. Many have
 Lost their marriages, opportunities, relationships and lives because they submitted to the rulership of Mr. Anger. Here Mr. Anger asked this older son not to go in to his fathers house and he heeded.

However, his loving father who knew that he was already a slave of Mr. Anger and would not that Anger would destroy his life and relationship with immediately went out and pleaded with him. Though there was celebration going on in the house but he is such loving father who would not want to lose any of his son, he had to leave the celebration in order to attend to the son who was angry. When he came he even when he had not heard from him he began to plead with him. He did not blame or criticize him for not understanding the situation at hand he rather pleaded with him. He did not criticize him for not first asking him what the matter was rather than asking the servants. There are many reasons why the father would have scolded him but he did not take that path. He treated him with love.

If I am the one who my child is angry because his brother came back and there is celebration going on what will be my action? Will I also become angry with him or will I understand him?

Lord help me to learn of Your lovely nature. That I will easily understand people especially when old man is dealing with them. Give me this grace.

THE REASON FOR ANGRY 	Luke 15:29
But he answered his father, 'Look! All these years I've been slaving for you and never disobeyed your orders. Yet you never gave me even a young goat so I could celebrate with my friends. 	NIV

Every anger has a reason. It is what is going on in the mind that brings about the change in countenance, speech and action. The elder son who was angry now opened up to his father his reason for being angry. They include thus;

1. These years I've been slaving for you
His first reason is that he saw himself as a slave. He has been serving his father as a slave not as a son. He does not find delight in serving and working for his father. Though he was working he was working as a son who all that the father has belong to him. He is just doing as if it is to his father. He never saw it as his own. He did not see it as a natural obligation to work for his father who takes care of him. Biologically he was a son but mentally he was a slave. This is why he has to depend on the servant to receive information of what was going on in the family.  His anger was that he was a son but he was serving as a slave and his father did not recognize it.

2. Never disobeyed your orders
Another issue that fueled his anger was his loyalty to his father. He was so careful to note that he never disobeyed his father’s order. He diligently obeys his fathers instructions. He was holy sort to say. Again, he saw his obedience as a duty not a delight. He was not obeying his father out of love but out of obligation like a slave. That if he does not obey his father his father will deal with him. He was meticulous in keeping the commandments of his father not out of a loving and a delightful heart but a legalistic spirit. He did not see that the orders he was obeying was for his own good. He is proud that he never disobeyed his father but he never rejoices that the orders have kept him safe and sound.

3. Yet you never gave me even a young goat so I could celebrate with my friends
Again, the third matter that made him angry was that despite his service and sacrifice to his father his father never gave him a young goat to celebrate with his friends. He expected his father to be sensitive to discern that he needed a goat to celebrate but unfortunately his father did not observe that. It was not even a fatten calf he was expecting from his father but a young goat. That tells of his slavery mentality. Slaves goes for the least. I think his father never gave him because he never asked. His father gave his younger brother estate because he asked. But this older brother was lost in service that he did not even know what belonged to him.

The basis of his expectation and reward from the father was on the ground of his service and righteousness not grace. His father gave his younger brother what asked not because of what he did or what he did not did but because of the fathers benevolent heart and also it was his inheritance as son.

THE REASON FOR ANGRY 	Luke 15:30
But when this son of yours who has squandered your property with prostitutes comes home, you kill the fattened calf for him!' 	NIV

Another thing that made the older son to be angry was that the celebration was for the son who squandered his fathers property with prostitutes. It was unimaginable. How could his father do such a thing. Him who has been slaving and obeying his father, his father did not do anything for him but for the prodigal he killed a fatten calf.

What he said was true and fact but he did not see what the father saw. The father was not seeing the property rather he was seeing the life. Life was more important to the father than the property that was squandered. He still have other property. But if he was lost or dead there will be nothing that can be done. Lost of life is irrecoverable but lost of property is recoverable. Life gained is to be celebrated but life loss is to be mourned. If the son did not come back the family will be mourning his death. Now he was back would they not celebrate his safe and sound return.

God is not disturbed that we waste his time, talent and treasures. His great worry and loss is the lost of the soul of His children. Coming back to Him brings joy to the father. Even if the person come back to Him poor, maimed, diseased, he would celebrate him. What is dear to Him is life and not things. The same is of the devil. Devil is not just after things but the soul of men. He give or deny a man things in order to gain his soul. The soul of man is the bone of contention between the kingdom of heaven and hell. All that God is doing is only centered on restoring man into His kingdom. That is why there is great celebration in heaven over one soul that repents.

To the elder brother his utmost concern was that the younger son wasted his fathers property with the prostitutes. But for the father he was celebrating because the his son whom he thought was dead and lost was back safe and sound.

The think is not the way God thinks. How do I see unbelievers and immature believers? Am I more concerned about what they are wasting or the life they are wasting?

Lord open my eyes to see as you see? don’t allow me to be myopically selfish.

MY SON 	Luke 15:31
"'My son,' the father said, 'you are always with me, and everything I have is yours. NIV

Though the elder son was angry and was not seeing the way the father was seeing yet the father was not harsh on him. He still called him “My son”. he did not shout down on him. He did not complained that he was not considerate and compassionate as himself. He called him first my son. Before he could say or do anything else he recognized that he was his son.

The implication of calling him “My son” is to still infuse into him that he was not a slave. The son was seeing himself by way of his thinking that he was slaving for the father all this years. He wanted to assure him that he was a son and not a servant or slave. My father meaning “I” gave birth to you. You are not from another source. You are my own blood. I owe you responsibility. You are not just a son you are my son.

The elder son needed to hear this again from the father. It is an affirmation of strength and confident. The son possibly was already depressed and discouraged because of the way he was serving the father. He saw himself no longer as a son but a servant. The father calling him “My son” was to once again infuse in him the assurance that he was still his son and not a servant.

YOU ARE ALWAYS WITH ME 	Luke 15:31
"'My son,' the father said, 'you are always with me, and everything I have is yours. NIV

You are always with me
He also went further to reaffirm to him of his status with him. You are always with me. The father recognized the place and position of the elder son. He was always with the father. Unlike the younger son who left the father to a far country.

The father could say this because there were two things about the elder son that made him to be always with the father. They are service and obedience. The elder son secured the continual presence of his father by service and obedience. He was at the disposal of his father. He was available to do the will of his father. He diligently carries out the instruction and order of his father.

Obedience and service secures a continual presence of the father. As Christians this is still the same. We maintain a continuous presence and fellowship with God by serving the purpose of God and obeying the command of God. None must be found missing. Service without obedience is not acceptable. Obedience without service is not also correct.

Saul tried to serve the Lord without obedience and the Lord said unto him “Obedience is better than sacrifice.” even if there is  any of the two to chose it will be obedience. Jesus said, “If you love me keep my commandment.” obedience is far important than service. Any service without obedience will lead to hell fire. But obedience without service will lead to loss of reward in heaven. But it is better to engage both in service and obedience to the heavenly Father so that His words for us will be “You are always with Me.”

Lord help me to serve your purpose for my life and obey your instructions so that I will always be with You.

ALL I HAVE IS YOURS 	Luke 15:31
"'My son,' the father said, 'you are always with me, and everything I have is yours. NIV

A son is a heir. The father once again reaffirmed to his son the implication of calling him my son. He is the heir of all that he has. The elder brother was angry because of his ignorant. Though he was serving and obeying the father he never knew that all that the father had was his. He though he was serving and obeying his father for nothing.

He never knew that it was himself he was working for. He thought he was doing good for his father. All he was doing was for his. All that the father belonged to him. The fieild of his father where he has been working belonged to him. The fatten calf and the kid calf belonged to him. All that the father had belonged to him. Ignorant made him to live like a slave. He never came to his father to make request. It was to the younger brother who demanded for his inheritance that the father gave what he requested.

As a son and child of God do I know that all that God has I am a co heir with Christ. The earth has he given to the sons of men. Everything that God has is mine because I am His son. In Christ Jesus He has begotten me as His son.



Eph 1:5
He predestined us to be adopted as his sons through Jesus Christ, in accordance with his pleasure and will. NIV

John 1:12
 But as many as received him, to them gave he power to become the sons of God, even to them that believe on his name: KJV

This should continually spark and spring joy in my heart. I should never have any cause to be depressed in this life knowing that God is my Father and everything He has is mine. All I need is this knowledge. If I do not realize this I may be living as a slave even in my own inheritance.

Lord open the eyes of my understanding to know that as your son that all You have is mine.

WHY IT IS RIGHT TO CELEBRATE 	Luke 15:32
•	It was meet that we should make merry, and be glad: for this thy brother was dead, and is alive again; and was lost, and is found.	KJV
•	But it is right to celebrate. For he is your brother; and he was dead and has come back to life! He was lost and is found!'" TLB
•	but this is a wonderful time, and we had to celebrate. This brother of yours was dead, and he's alive! He was lost, and he's found!'" MSG
•	We had to celebrate this happy day. For your brother was dead and has come back to life! He was lost, but now he is found!'" NLT
•	But it was fitting to make merry, to revel and feast and rejoice, for this brother of yours was dead and is alive again! He was lost and is found! AMP

The father here gives the older son the reason for celebrating the return of the young son. He was not celebrating for celebrating sake. There was a reason that called for the celebration. He was not celebrating because there was calf and drinks. The bases for his celebration was because the dead was made alive and lost was found.

The older brother wanted his father to give him a kid to go and celebrate with his friends. There was no reason for the celebration. It was just to celebrate to satisfy the cravings of the natural and fleshly desires. But in the celebration of the father it was for the restoration of the soul.

The celebration of the father was fitting. It was not just to eat, drink and dance because there was availability of resources. It was because the son whom he thought was lost was found again. That instead of mourning he now celebrates.

One celebration that is right and fitting for our heavenly Father is the repentance and return of a sinner. Heaven celebrates the return of one sinner who repents. Heavens does not rejoice over trivial matters of life. The weightier matter that calls heaven celebration is the repentance of a soul. Not even souls but a soul. A soul is a enough to cause the whole heaven to rejoice and celebrate.

Lord, may You help me to find delight in celebrating where and what You Yourself celebrate. May my celebration be not in mundane and selfish cravings of this life. Help that I will celebrate on what is right in Your eyes to celebrate.
